Genre: Young adult, science-fiction
By this time I was exhausted. I hurt, I was hungry, I was pissed. I wanted my daughter out of the birth canal and in my arms.
Like I said, I’ve barely cracked into the book, but if the first chapter is any indication, this book is going to seriously rock my world something fierce (and I just might not be able to handle that).
The feet are also different, but I usually don't notice those until I'm browsing and culling my shots. Finally, bees and wasps have four wings, while flies only have two - Di-ptera, two-winged.
Entry #52
THE GENTLEMEN: Come On (If You Can)
When people ask me about unschooling, I often say we follow a child led education learning from life. In this situation, that is exactly what I did. Unschooling doesn't just exist within the confines of our home or just for my children. We are all constantly learning and constantly trying to figure out the best route for our unique personalities. I am glad I unschooled my way through this situation.
CHARLOTTE, N.C. -- Linda Jones knows the GOP has a problem, and she wants to do something about it. As president of the Charlotte-Mecklenburg Republican Women, she would like her group of 200 to have more African American members; she said she doesn’t think it has any right now. So, in the name of minority outreach, last week’s meeting featured Toussaint Romain, and his topic: “Why I Became a Republican.”
What Lou is graciously saying is that Tony blew his lines on every take, so much so that they decided that maybe it would be best if Tony simply ‘looked’ the line. I guess that didn’t work either because, in Tony’s own words, “I ended up on the cutting-room floor.”
Firstly Invest in Re-Inkers, especially Distress ones. The reason for this is many. There is so much you can do with Re-Inkers above and beyond re inking your stamp pads or using stamping foam to make your own custom stamps or stamp pads for ones you have yet to own the Ink Pad of.
- black sugar (to add to sand effect)
Amitie Circle BOM
An interesting take on hell that involves living in suburbia and getting your heart ripped out. Good creativity here.
Six years after that fateful night, Paul, being a rather violent man, got into a domestic fight with his parents. Paul had attacked his mother as she denied him access to the family car. And his father had enough of dealing with Paul. He grabbed his riffle and shot his son in the back of the head as he hovered over his mother with a butcher knife. Jesse went from girlfriend to girlfriend and beat every single one of them when they didn’t behave in the manner he saw fit. None of the girls ever filed charges against Jesse because they were so afraid of him, but his last girlfriend wasn’t lucky enough to receive just beatings. Jesse got, a life sentence in a maximum security prison in Kentucky for beating his girlfriend to death with a tire iron. Seven years after the rape, Michael joined the army and just after graduating boot camp he was killed by “so-called” friendly fire.
Urban Decay Matte Eyeshadows in Naked and Secret Service. I love UD's matte eyeshadows, especially the Naked. It works so well with my skin tone for crease definition. Just that and I'm good to go for a working day. For more definition, I'll add Secret Service to the outer corner of my eye and blend into the crease. Highly recommend. Especially when using a blush with lots of sheen like the Elf Peachy Keen and Tarte Chic.
I can't even get him to leave well enough alone now that he AC is set up by my, and not worry about it until September.
Before The Killing came Spiral, a fast paced and gritty French drama following the investigations of Laure Berthaud and her squad. Little seems to separate the flics and the delinquents here; violence and corruption are everywhere and everyone is tainted. Berthaud’s drive to root out evil doers seems driven by obsession rather than morality, and she seems destined to destroy both herself and those around her in the process. Of the three series available, the first and third are most worthwhile but it’s all compelling viewing. I just couldn’t get over Laure’s hair in series two.
I go Wow. A straight tail Beechcraft Bonanza. (Those are really unusual, you mostly see the V-tails. My first flight instructor had a V-Tail--they were called Doctor/Lawyer killers for a time, but he flew for United so it wasn't going to kill him.)
The next time you are in a hurry in the morning, remember that you are probably about to skip the most important meal of the day. If you follow the tips above, you’ll find that you have plenty of time for breakfast. Breakfast, Child Health, Cooking, Eating, Fitness, Food, Full breakfast, Health, Home, Human nutrition, Nutrition, Top Weight loss, Weight, Weight Loss Tips, weight tips
This is a story of two young women from different backgrounds who end up working together on a school project and start to build a friendship. Though they both don’t want one, as they trust no one. Keeping secrets from everyone is how they both like it.
Anyway, I stuck with it, despite it making me feel for a major part of the book that when he finally did find inner peace, it wouldn’t be… true enough to life? It wouldn’t be a good way to be? Worth all the frustration? I dunno. I just didn’t expect it to end on a good note for my interpretation of the book.
I have had so much fun reading all of your baby name suggestions and watching the little gender poll ticker these past few days. On Wednesday as luck would have it I showed up for my regular OB appointment and because of some complications and tests was not allowed to leave. I have been admitted into the hospital now for monitored bed rest until this little one makes his/her debut. Hopefully not until the end of next week so that we can clear the 35 week mark and get us a healthy little preemie to take home.
Olfabrikken Porter
The Rand is busy falling and the collapse of this economy is only a matter of time. Service delivery has grind to a halt and the people are angry. Promises made by the ANC Regime have not materialised and the people are angry. Infrastructure has collapsed and the Soccer World Cup 2010 virtually bankrupted this country as it did with every other country.
"The problem with retirement accounts is that they're hostage to future Congresses' greed." That is the lead in a short item on Instapundit, and it is absolutely true. It extracts, and links to, a Wall Street Journal article that tells of a Senate Finance Committee proposal being tucked into the highway funding bill that would require most inherited IRAs and 401(k)s to be emptied out within five years of the time they're inherited. This has been proposed as a means of increasing government tax revenues (from income taxes) by $4.6 billion over the next ten years. (Shall we play "guess the party" as to whose proposal this is?)
DEMICHELI V, JEFFERSON T, RIVETTI D, DEEKS J. Prevention and early treatment of influenza in healthy adults. Vaccine 2000; 18: 957-1030.
After December 12 all kits will ship within 3 business days of payment being made. Feel free to add any of my PDFs to your cart before you purchase a kit. I have purchased materials for a limited number of kits so be sure to purchase your kit soon. This is also going to be my last "kit" I put together. I am going to be launching something new in January 2012. I am really excited to share it with you. I will still be helping parents include art, handicrafts and nature study in their homeschool...but the look of Hearts and Trees is going to change. :)
Personally, Obama is for gay marriage. Of course at one time he was for only civil unions. But sometimes he isn't for it. In 1996 he was going to fight for gay marriage.
5.) Make the City Bike-able
I took my Intermediate Copic certification last month in Ohio. The class focused more on theory than technique, so I needed to come home and practice what they taught. I also needed to break down the information into smaller, more manageable pieces for the classes I would then teach. For my Copic 3 class, I will be teaching three-color blending, how to work with those tricky red markers, how to move beyond blending and into adding contrast to your work, and how to shade with grays or complementary colors. Copic has come up with a new equation for selecting colors, so we will be talk a lot about how to choose colors. Of course, we will also make four cards to practice all of those topics (pictured above).
But that brings up a bigger question…what makes a person happy? Sometimes I don’t even know what would make me happy. Sometimes I get so caught up in my own misery that I don’t even have a clue what steps I can do to feel joy. I also tend to try to make others happy, while neglecting me. I have definitely learned the hard way that you can’t make others happy…that is their responsibility not yours.
And at that exact moment I thought that, you looked me directly in the eyes and winked. Fuck roses and candles, THAT moment was romantic. And is making me smile right now.
2.) The stress of teaching High School students in a foreign place.
( Can I suggest you zoom in on this item to fully appreciate its constituent ingredients)
the enemy,
What’s more, Ofsted have stressed the importance of problem solving, and it featured in their report* published in November 2011. They advise that pupils’ confidence, fluency and versatility are nurtured through a strong emphasis on problem solving as an integral part of learning within each topic.
The Archmage gets the Talisman for the 4+ ward. Also, I gave him the Amulet of Light to give the unit that he is with magical attacks. The Silver Wand gives him an extra spell, which is the closest to Loremaster that I can get, so I am almost guaranteed to get the spells that I want. I am mainly shooting for Glittering Robes for the 5+ Scaly Skin radius to give the special choices a 3+ AS. Final Transmutation will be used for units with too many models in it and Enchanted Blades will be used for the AP on the spears if needed and hitting on 2s is nice also.
In a blender combine tequila, triple sec, lemon juice, simple syrup and ice. Blend until mixture is the consistency you desire. I like mine like an Icee, so we blend for a minute or so. Pour and serve immediately.
Cook for a few seconds.
Here are some of the “Good Songs” I compiled as a ‘thank you’ to the Lord. These songs are about faith, hope and love.
You will have members of your community whose experiences you cannot understand and whose objections seem to come out of nowhere. This is because you and they are not experiencing the same sides of your community. You could be standing in the same digital room with the same people and having the same conversation and not understand that their room is different from yours, and that this is normal.
Roses, however, might just work. They seem to do well in almost every planting zone and they actually like sunlight, which is a good thing around these parts. I've been doing a little researching about growing roses before I get started, in hopes that I might have gardening success!
jars, lids, and rings (perhaps 24 - we didn't count)
Alberto Del Rio is now Mr. Money in the Bank, winning. This too was an incredible match and the highlight of the match was seeing 7 men on the ladder, trying to scratch and crawl for the briefcase. The Miz was taken out, but he came back and hobbled up the ladder, only for Rey to stop him. Alberto took Rey’s mask off and ran to the ladder, grabbed it, and he won. We also had a very close call with Kofi and Jack Swagger when Kofi had Jack down on the mat, and the ladder tripped both of them. Swagger looked okay, but he could have messed up his neck. All 8 men fought hard, and at the end of the match, the right man won.
Recently I was told some information about some one that I wish I didn't know. Secrets bother me. They bother me when I know that the secret could destroy some one. Actually it could destroy more than one person. I didn't ask to be told, it just happened.
My rating: 5 of 5 stars
“I remember about the same time, before Obama became president, asking a group of black children — ranging in age from 12 to 14 — to name living black people who were well-known. But they didn’t name Condoleezza Rice, a name that at the time was mentioned constantly on the news. Neither did they name Nelson Mandela. That was something I found astonishing. Interestingly, they did name Jackie Chan.”
This is why I kind of dig vintage cards of goalies. Check out the huge leather pads, OK so modern pads are still huge but they use foam and nylon and plastic and simulated leather now. This Mr. Broderick is no relation to the Actor Matthew.
-bug
My blog is called The Wonderful Counselor, and on one page when describing myself, I say I am a ‘Struggling Christian.” Now, I have been told many times before that there is only struggling Christians in this world, because our flesh will not allow us to hold any other position under His rule and reign. But this sermon that I heard made good light of another way that showed me that we may all be struggling a bit more than I thought we were. Money is the culprit, and it is deep rooted in our lives, society, and personal goal. Simply put, we have allowed money to corrupt us all, and we have to spend a great amount of time, energy, and prayer to overcome it and its lustful ways. One of the ways I saw this recently in my own life was a small financial windfall that my family received. It should have made us happy, but circumstances arrived*** and we had our happiness taken down a few notches. It wasn’t what we thought it would be when it finally showed up, and not the amount, so much as the fact that it did not solve any problems. Sure, it alleviated some financial stress, but that did not fix the issues that were effecting us as a family, or us personally. It just made us feel more comfortable. Because, you see, money is comfort I am finding out. Money=comfort. If you have money, you can live comfortably. You can eat whenever or whatever you want, and you can have a big house with a huge television, sectional couches, surround sound movie atmosphere, and a popcorn maker if you want. You can sleep in all day every day in king sized beds with fine linen sheets, and have big fluffy heated blankets and comforters to wrap yourself in. You can go for a dip in your Olympic-sized swimming pool, and dry off after you sit in the shade of your swim up bar with big fluffy towels. You can get in the hot tub when your back hurts after playing tennis at the local country club all day. You can jet-set to other countries and spend money like a lavish prince having the time of your life at ski resorts, private islands, or the biggest party hot spots in the world. When you are tired, go for a ride on the ocean in your private yacht, and have a crew pilot you around until you land in a beautiful foreign land, and spend more and more cash until you have everything that you could possibly want. Ahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh…..doesn’t that sound great? To have millions of dollars at your disposal? To be able to accumulate stuff, and do anything that you want? You would be the Lord of your domain, and King of your castle. Heck, you may even start to feel like…God.
What is the name of your business and how did you come up with it?
THE HAMMER MUG.
Greece is already suffering through a great depression and now Spain is joining them. The following is from a recent BBC article….
Because sometimes things go my way.
“The Christians, you know, worship a man to this day,–the distinguished personage who introduced their novel rites, and was crucified on that account…and then it was impressed on them by their original lawgiver that they are all brothers, from the moment that they are converted, and deny the gods of Greece, and worship the crucified sage, and live after his laws.”
Helicopter size: 22 * 5 * 8.2cm
Dependable
* time for myself
In Sunday’s sermon on Genesis 15 we learned that Abram was saved based upon his faith. Genesis 15:6 reads, “And he believed the LORD, and he counted it to him as righteousness.” Abram believed that God would fulfill the promises he had made. He believed that God would turn him into a great nation and give him the land. He believed this to be true even though it seemed to be far-fetched (Abram was getting old and his wife was unable to have children). Yet, Abram continued to trust God’s word to him.
I’m very interested to hear what you guys have to say – when do YOU give up?
Of course, this country has its faults. Its full of fatties, third-worlders, and overweening liberals. The elite who comprise media, government, academia, and big business have wholly abandoned the rest of the nation, and in some cases, have openly waged a psychological war against the majority. While we still have legal freedoms (not so in Britain), organized leftism has perverted our culture, our historical narrative, and made thoughtcrimes a means of social suicide.
After great pain a formal feeling comes–
MO-03 Russ Carnahan
Prepare the glass:
There was also no occupational therapist present. That's because the island has only just employed one, and she has quite the wait list. We have met her once. I don't feel this really counts.
On Friday, I'll have a post about my experience at the Romantic Times Conference and what I learned there -- or maybe, more importantly, what I didn't learn -- along with a few pictures.
I love CSA day - coming home to sort, clean, load up the dehydrator, fill the oven, blanch and bag...and then making dinner from whatever I still have in the fridge to make room for the new. It feels good to see so much right there (I usually bring in the garden goodies too, to get it all done at once). Oh, think of how much we will enjoy it in January! I have a LOT of cucumbers - I need to get cranking on some more pickles.
The question is whether or not these lyrical activities are somehow different from the background design. Does a so-called “human mark” have any more purchase in a painting than a programmed or machined one? Are not Monzon’s human marks still made with a brush, just like the surfaces of his found designs? Is Monzon expressing himself in spite of rules and order (humanity atop rigorous design) or can we just say that everything on Monzon’s surfaces is equivalent, that all is surface, that all the colors and shapes fall in the so called trap of representation where there is nothing really human but there is instead just a performance inside of a system that does not allow true humanity or any further thoughts on what it means to be one. Maybe that is all being a human is, fooling yourself into thinking that you are unique or expressive (you find this latter belief in the paintings of Sarah Morris for example where design is all encompassing and, though intuitively arrived at, is pervasive and overbearing).
I need not have troubled. It was an entirely wasted journey. For when I eventually reported to the Provincial Commissioner in Fort Jameson, I learned to my sorrow that I was not required for the moment and should return to work and await normal instructions; if I were needed I would be called up, like everyone else, through the usual channels.
It’s a question worth pondering even for a few minutes…what would people from the future know about you because of what you own?
He was the chief cook and I was the chief 'bottle washer.' Tossing dough is a messy business with all of that flour flying around! We shared many laughs, talked in our fake Italian accents (he's really good at it..me? Not so much), and just enjoyed the time we had together in the kitchen.
Time spent investigating re forested pasture land, cellar holes, foundation corners and abandoned graveyards gave Gordon the opportunity to think about the physical space his character inhabited and what that meant to her every day life.
If you are bored with the typical grilled chicken sandwich that is deemed "healthy", you have to give this pesto recipe a try. The pesto makes the sandwich! I'll explain this in two parts - the pesto first:
It is a very funny little film starring the always-good Brendan Gleeson as a village policeman in the West of Ireland. He uses prostitutes, has taken cocaine and ecstasy and swears casually. Which I found was part of the slight (but only slight) problem with the script.
Are you ready to get some inspiration from these new stamp sets?
life-destroying industries such as taxation and the judicial
But the banks are made of marble
I grabbed my calendar, notebook and collection of cookbooks and started planning. My first round was just dinners but I decided it would help save time and money to plan out breakfast, lunches and dinners. I found a favorite meal planning schedule online for free and have used it for many years now.
Oh well I’m about to get ready for bed. I’m not feeling too good at the moment…I’m tired of fucking crying over this stupid shit.
Seeing families reunified. Seeing parents get their lives straightened out so they can be a healthy mom or dad again. We fostered 2 boys, brothers, for about 5 months and they were reunified with their mom. We have been invited to their birthday parties since that time and have been able to take the kids on day trips fishing, bowling, etc. It is awesome to see that the kids are doing well with their mom. There really isn’t anyone better than mom! We are fostering 2 children now who will most likely be reunified with their mom in a few months. During this time we have developed a good relationship with both their parents and work as a team to raise the kids by bouncing ideas off each other and backing each other up. The children we are fostering now are thriving and excelling in school.
Soak lentils 4 hours then drain well.
With many a silvery waterbreak
“Now”, he declared, “I’m going to show you some magic”, and at the press of a button the air in the box instantly became clear.
Hands also do things. They wave, point, gesture, touch chins or noses, and each of these gestures and mannerisms tells us about the character.
“The entire world is watching. So let’s seize this moment to show why the United States of America is still the greatest nation on Earth,” Obama said. “Not just because we can still keep our word and meet our obligations, but because we can still come together as one nation,”
+ PHAR-CITY
White card from the Papermill
It looks like the only medications that I see advertised which have an intriguing sounding side effect would be those that warn of a four hour 'attention' span, as it were. Not something the lone desperado really needs. That is a side effect best shared with your close social circle. No close social circle, no need to seek such things.
You don’t have to be a doctor to use a transcription service. ScribeRight is aimed at anyone who’s tired of typing. Dictate notes and record meetings and have the document sent right to your email or stored online, ready for use. And feel free to enjoy your relief from symptoms of carpal tunnel syndrome.
These “trees” are works of art that take years (think three decades or more) to mold into the final product. Many of them have been shaped into certain shapes or styles of bonsai, such as the cascade or semi-cascade bonsai, which is designed to mirror the trees seen clinging to cliff-sides.
With background established, the OG took her very first reading TAKS this year, that extremely important third grade year. You know, the OG? The one that was reading chapter books when she was four? The one that topped their reading assessments when she was in the first grade? And, yes, the one that is also extremely hyperactive, and duly medicated as such?
Councilmember Rice remains the leading proponent on the Council of Leggett’s youth curfew proposal. Conceding it was no “panacea” for youth crime, but rather part of a comprehensive approach, Rice insisted it would oppose an alleged “mentality among our children that they can do whatever they want whenever they want” — even if it would often (indeed generally) be incorrectly timed to do so.
We did this, after moving from Ontario to Fort McMurray just last summer, for the same reason we’ve always moved over the past 4 years: Because I have yet to find a doctor in Canada willing to work with me to help me regain some semblance of a normal life.
Kathryn Rose (Lab) 1507
Once we reach 300 fans I will be giving out another $25 gift certificate!
Severe Risk: Yes - possible event.
My prayer now is that if you are a Mormon, you will study the entire passage in 1 Corinthians 15 to see where this teaching originated. I can assure you that it had nothing to do with the Mormon Jesus’ teaching on the ‘eternal principles’ of baptizing for the dead in the meridian of times and everything to do with Jesus’ resurrection as told consistently in other scriptures in the bible. Can Mormons present the same evidence for Baptism of the dead being taught elsewhere in scripture?
Dear Dr. Mikovits,
Duke has improved greatly and we are finally setting in as a family. Duke's anxieties have lessened, which makes it much less stressful around here, which finally makes it easier for me to feel relaxed enough to sit down to write.
As for the whole film, it kind of came off as sub par despite winning three oscars with five more oscar nominations. It had quite a few of those radom music videos that films that feature music stars tend to have. Despite my love for the woman, I didn't really like Madonna in the film. She's just not a bombshell. She's beautiful, she's sexy, but she's not the boss's gal. I pictured more of a Jessica Rabbit type with some dangerous curves in that role. Plus, the character was kind of random, so it wasn't all Madonna's bad. But I do feel a different actress could have made it work. Al Pacino, playing Big Boi, was wonderful in the movie and his character was similarly a little random. But he made it work.
What they did not understand then, even as we many times do not ourselves now, is that this terrible tragedy was completely under God’s control. As Jesus died upon the cross sin and death were defeated, in His seemingly weakest hour, the strength of God was made manifest as redemption was poured out upon all humanity. In that weakness and pain and suffering that Jesus endured, the power of the living God rested upon the world bring salvation and restoration to all.
December 12 -- 31, 2006
I walk the middle of the road
Oceanic Whirlpools; Hurricanes; Tornados; bathtub whirlpools; eddies in rivers; Jupiter’s Red Spot; Two star systems where one star’s gravity is pulling in the other star; whirlpool galaxies that experience gravitational pull of a gravity object.
Right off ta do a bit more writing.
Thus, to the extent that we can make the tax system more progressive on the revenue side and more redistributive on the benefit side, the more we can ensure that the value of people’s labor is recaptured and redistributed back to them. While it’s fairly common among progressive policy wonks to argue that the EITC should be expanded into what is effectively a Guaranteed Annual Wage (as opposed to a Guaranteed Minimum Income), I think we have to both expand the scope of our ambitions and lift the level of our rhetoric.
Today the author of Slice of Laodicea is lamenting things that are now, in her words, ‘optional’ in the church. She wrote:
Dunedin City Council is being called upon to honour its commitment to underwrite the lossmaking Masters Games. The biennial veterans sports event was a huge success on the field: more than 6000 people took part in a total of 7203 events, and almost half were out-of-town visitors. However, the Masters Games was unable to secure a naming rights sponsor. It also lost one silver level sponsor and was unable to use the University Union as its Games Village. That caused the games to lose revenue of $153,364, a report to the DCC said. #bookmark
The Walpole Bay was a wonderful surprise. It’s described as a living museum by its owners, the Bishop family, and that’s exactly how it’s presented – a glorious mish-mash of Edwardiana, thirties and forties artifacts, wartime memorabilia, and...tat. You could spend a very happy weekend there just poking about among the contents without even needing to venture outside to admire the sea views. Unsurprisingly the hotel has been featured in numerous films and TV programmes, and equally unsurprisingly the walls are peppered with photos of visiting and local celebs.
Untraditionally traditional. That's what I call my design style. It's a tad bit traditional with the squared seating arrangement, and I like a small amount of balance in a room - the two shelf units against the wall take care of that. But that's where traditional ends. I don't do matchy-matchy. I have a hodge podge of styles, designs, thrifted pieces, handmade pieces, purchased art, and DIY stuff (like our newly finished ottoman that we made ourselves). My favorite colors fall within various shades of blue and teal, and I try to incorporate them into every space in our home without them taking over or being too obvious.
long long kiss on his bloody-lipped swollen mouth,
Though I’m not a full-fledged geek, I’m usually an early technology adopter. I was the first person at my first job to get email (and then showed everyone else how to sign up). I’ve been on Facebook, LinkedIn, and Twitter for years, and I’m now trying to figure out why I should care about Google+.
I loved the story in this novel and thought it was a very unique spin on Jane Austen’s tale. I love historical fiction and it was intriguing reading about Napoleon and the infamous Battle of Waterloo as fought by Austen’s beloved characters. I loved how so many of my favorite characters returned including Fitzwilliam and Elizabeth Darcy, the Bingleys, the Collins, etc. I also like how Caroline Bingley was given a great depth and an ability to redeem herself. Anne de Bourgh is also fleshed out and given a great depth. Napoleon is not the only villain in this novel with appearances from Lady Catherine de Bourgh, Mr. Wickham, and Willoughby. If I had to face Napoleon or Lady Catherine, I’m not sure which would be the safer route!
So what are you waiting for? Search for your purpose in life if you haven’t already found it.
This foaming hand wash cleanses your hands with organic extracts of acai and maqui berry to soothe and restore dry, sensitive skin.
“The Serpent Column (Turkish, Yılanlı Sütun) — also known as the Serpentine Column, Delphi Tripod or Plataean Tripod — is an ancient bronze column at the Hippodrome of Constantinople (known as Atmeydanı “Horse Square” in the Ottoman period) in what is now Istanbul, Turkey. It is part of an ancient Greek sacrificial tripod, originally in Delphi and relocated to Constantinople by Constantine I the Great in 324. The serpent heads of the 8-meter high column remained intact until the end of the 17th century (one is on display at the nearby Istanbul Archaeology Museums).
The guy on the street, the woman in the classroom, the Israeli, the Afghani, the Zuni, the Apache, the Irish, the Protestant, the Catholic, the gay, the straight, you, me—we all just want to know that we matter. We want validation. We want the same things. We want safety and we want to live a long life. We want to find somebody to love.We want to find somebody to laugh with and have the power and the place to cry with when necessary.
That Chicken Dust was everywhere... inside cabinets and drawers, on our clothes the wardrobe, on all the toiletry items inside bathroom cabinets, and so on. Lynda spent over 8 hours just cleaning the bathroom and shaking out our clothes! I focused on the outside of the Trek, emptying all the basement compartments, wiping down and hosing off gear and equipment. I cleaned the Trek's air filter and topped up the oil, replaced several bulbs for the running lights, replaced the air filter on the generator, and tightened up the scooter carrier. And we did several loads of laundry and washed the dogs. By the time we left Whitehorse, we were pretty worn out but the Trek was livable once again.
9/10 A truly special beer, rich, warming and extravagant in flavour.
"Well, that's true, but only when we're downtown."
We went out for sushi, and I had miso soup. Then I decided I would take all the shrapnel out of my mouth and see how wide I can open, and I ordered edimame.
It is rare to see a group of friends playing what might as well dominate our Sunday’s chart shows (it certainly should!), where each has unique qualities that blend together so nicely. The guitar playing on ‘All Over’ was simply sublime, but that is only possible when the rest of the band knows how to highlight and complement each other in a very crafty and ingenious way. Here’s to having high hopes to something that deserves to go on for long.
And a bona fide guru who follows the orders of his guru will never fall down.
And that I don't have to remind myself
Needless to say, all of my efforts to get our patient, my partner, and myself safely to the hospital were achieved. But as for the hundreds of little amphibians in the path of a Paramedic behind the wheel, they met a different fate.
A controversial special police unit – already implicated in a host of crimes, including murder – has been caught on closed-circuit television (CCTV) showing its members stomping on ¬the patrons of a bar, jumping on one, pouring alcohol on people and kicking and slapping them.
“Cater to You” – Martha Karua to Moi
No! I’ve participated in the Bout of Books readathon twice and the Dewey 24-hour readathon. Love them!
Kindest Regards
It was also a crucial business decision.
to know you
Today I went to the Paperback Show in Mission Hills that I've been telling you about. Despite the downpour of rain from the biggest storm this entire year there was a good turnout. I can always tell whether there's going to be a good turnout by the number of people that have to park in the overflow lot behind the hotel, and today was no exception.
Licensed Practical Nurse = 4% of work load
Hello, Dear Readers! Welcome back and Happy Tuesday (first time typing that? Probably!) to you all! Today's blog comes with three pieces of Shadows on the Moon news which I hope you'll find as interesting as I do.
Wendys Invitational Aug. 12-15 Portland, OR – Rose Quarter
You definitely should check out the blogs of these amazing ladies!
Unmentioned in the lawsuit, but clearly backing the allegations, is a November 2008 statement by Forest City Enterprises (FCE), parent of Forest City Ratner, at a real estate conference that Atlantic Yards is among "Active Large Scale Projects Where We Control the Pace."
And on another note, what message is it sending to the oodles of kids who see this? In the wake of the recent bullying epidemic which has led to the actual DEATHS of some kids, is it really wise to encourage kids to toss about monikers such as "dorks", "lame" and "nerd"? Yes, I realize that MoppetBoy is using these words to brand his parents, but imagine if it was him describing a classmate whose parents had the audacity to drive anything less than the giant, shiny rolling great-room that is the Toyota Highlander?
On Mystica’s shoulder,
We are in a room on our regular floor admitted for observation of seizures. Since giving Lucy her phenobarbital dose for the night we have not seen any more seizure episodes. Prior to that we had several episodes that were observed by the admitting team. We are very concerned that she is having a paradoxical reaction to the methadone…ugh. She is extremely agitated and irritable one moment, and then distant and nonresponsive the next. We were very hopeful that methadone would be a great med for Lucy since it is effective at controlling neuropathic pain. I am looking forward to meeting directly with our palliative care doctor tomorrow and discussing things. Not sure if I mentioned this, but our main doc is out of the country(he promises this is the last time for a long time) until February 25th which adds so much more stress to our already stressful life. The doctor that is covering Lucy for him knows our girl well, but apparently didn’t know she was starting methadone yesterday. I wonder how that detail was forgotten? I am not sure I am looking forward to seeing her as much in the morning, but we do need to talk. Hopefully we all come up with some sort of plan to get us to the 25th.
We decided to have lunch at Wayfare Tavern, and as I was walking over from work, a middle aged gentleman asked me, "Do you know how to get to Montgomery and Sacramento?"
6 Tbs brown sugar
Skolnick
An article I thought was fairly balanced article about the pros and cons of wearing headphones at work and what it means to be “together alone” in environments where we are physically proximate and yet focused on completely different things.
I think a lot of folks forget that. They have one foot in and one foot out. Whats the old saying? A monkey doesn’t let go of a branch unless they have hold of another one? True that.
So another week down! I must admit, the last couple of Me Made challenges I've participated in were a struggle. Being relatively new to sewing I had only a handful of "wearable" MM items to choose from which made putting together outfitsVERY tricky; and often resulted in somewhat bizarre combinations that certainly didn't reflect my personal style very much. This time around, it's proving easier. Namely because I have a growing number of MM items to play with AND, more and more of them are reflective of my personal style. I've never really had a "personal style aesthetic" before. It really was a bit incoherent, mismatched and I had alot of "stuff" that just didn't go with other "stuff" or just didn't suit me! But the ability to sew and adapt my own clothes seems to have opened the door for me to experiment with different shapes/styles and I can definately see a few patterns emerging in how I dress....
Latin Poet, 43 BC – 18 AD
His frustration showed through a little bit there and the tenderness and sadness seemed to have taken a hike. I decided to keep quiet.
This wonderful pyramid is almost a divine compliment to the way “the field” has built itself (and since changed) within my readings.
You could have said, "We are very sensitive to the pain of so many Americans during the ongoing recession. We are bringing 3 billion in business back to the US in the hope that this will put some of our deserving fellow citizens back to work." Even if the reality is that much of the 3 billion will be spent elsewhere and the contract would only create one more job, every job is valuable these days. And it would look so much better to the kind, generous people whose money you are currently living on.
In case anyone's interested, my hairdresser was Yumiko Jones and she works in London and Bristol. She is super nice and really listened to what I wanted. She said one of the reasons she likes England is that people have individual style. She was interested in the 40s hairstyles I showed her and treated my demands like they were the most natural thing in the world. It's always nice not to have the justify your requests (why do you want pointed nails/half moons/arched brows?)!
Say: Make contact with each of your family members this week. If they’re gone, write a letter or talk to them from the heart.
Oh wait! That isn’t even the best part! Here I am ranting about how I am just dreading every moment when I am lot texting him. That when he texts me a hi or a hey, what is my response? You would think it would be like “hello cutie, did you miss me?” or “I want to be with you. So stop the act and tell me you want to kiss me.” but no I simply just text back a hi and wait for him to say it first. I mean I know I have a boyfriend but what do you do if your standing there being faithful and suddenly your heart does these flips and dangerously fast pounding when you see them? I’ll tell you what you do.
While I was aboard that rescue ship, I knew, I knew, that part of me was still drowning. I knew that something was getting lost in all that mopping. But great things carry with them great inertia and the ship that saved me was the greatest of them all. Ojai was just the beginning, and it was so big, and so different, that despite my weekly mandated journeys back into Los Angeles, it ripped up the soil long enough to drop seeds inside of me beneath the roots of foreign trees. Each seed, each vision I had up there, each dream, each word I wrote, each thought, lay within me growing and growing like different pieces of a puzzle. They got so big, first I had to make a small change, then another small change, then a bigger one, and then, at last, I made colossal changes left and right, up-rooting what did not belong and making way for the new, waiting to see what shape it would take.
4. read to the little ones more
That isn't aweful, but by the time you download the Netflix app and find a movie you wont have enough battery to watch it!
You're bound to hurt yourself that way
Click on the speakers name to register for the event.
Following the last opinion, instead of the first, which was the one the rabbi focused on when telling me about the comparison with Avraham Avinu and Moshe Rabenu, A”S, we might get another understanding of what is at hand.
For $80 we got the new bench that you see in the pictures. I added a thick piece of foam to the top to make it extra comfy (Parker can kneel on this bench for an hour – it’s that soft) and recovered it with a laminated fabric, found here. We tackled this project only a couple of months ago and the laminated fabric selection have grown a lot since then. Joel Dewberry just released a great line of laminated fabrics.
I am sort of embarrassed to think of my reaction to this day, not because it did not turn out to be true but because it was a knee jerk, unthinking reaction. For a day or so, I could think of nothing else. Was he really?How would I be able to face him again?
And pray in secret.
Combine the heavy whipping cream and milk in a medium bowl with a lip and set aside. In another medium bowl (yes, a second bowl - the amount of dishes you'll dirty in this recipe is daunting in itself), whisk together the egg yolks, egg and cornstarch until well integrated and frothy. Heat a large, heavy-bottomed saucepan over medium-low heat and cook the sugar, salt and 1/2 cup of water until the sugar dissolves. Turn the heat up to medium-high and continue cooking without stirring for 10 or so minutes, swirling occasionally to ensure it cooks evenly. The mixture will look a bit lava like, bubbling up and what not, but this is totally normal -- just let it keep doing its bubbling, lava-like thing until it turns a deep, dark caramel color. Reduce the heat to low and slowly add the cream/milk in a steady stream, whisking constantly to integrate with the caramelized sugar. Take caution to not add it too quickly -- the pan will be very hot and the mixture can very easily bubble over. (I know this because it bubbled over a bit for me... oops!) Continue whisking and cooking for a few more minutes over medium heat (again, attending closely to it so it doesn't boil over and make a horrible mess all over the stove and possibly the floor.) Turn off the heat, and ladle out 1 cup off the hot cream and sugar mixture and gradually add to the eggs, whisking constantly so the eggs don't scramble. Continue adding the cream until half the mixture has been incorporated, then gradually add the egg/cream back to the saucepan, continuing to whisk constantly to keep the texture smooth. (This is especially important if you plan not to strain the pudding like some of us lazy folk. Ahem, me.) Cook the custard over medium heat for a couple more minutes until it start to bubble a bit and takes on a consistency that's thick enough to coat the back of a spoon. Remove the custard from the heat and whisk in the butter and rum.
It seems obvious doesn’t it?
…Sean David Morton wants to know! He could be our last line of defense.
An Eastern Cape policeman accused of murder has been granted R1 000 bail by the Motherwell Magistrate's Court on Monday, said the Independent Complaints Commission.
Part of the reason I've been AWOL is that we recently finalised the sale of our family home, and my Dad and I are madly trying to find a place to rent in the meantime. I plan to return to blogging within the next fortnight after we get settled in. I've got some super awesome makeup and non-makeup related things *cough* I may or may not have met the Weasley Twins *cough* that I can't wait to share with you guys ^__^
Understanding the basic mentality in Southern Sudan is a struggle. There have
the truth as exposed to date and that they are ready to hear
2. Add a larger half-circle below the circle and slightly off to one side.
“I voted for Obama, and it was a big mistake,” said one protestor who lofted a sign equating Obama with a swastika symbol. “I’m very angry about it. Obama is murdering thousands of people throughout the world with his drone strikes.”
but she still won't let me do a thing with it.
The person who did the Thinking Man sculpure (I´m getting tired, and restless, so I´m not going to look up his name. hahaha :P ) did a ton of other paintings, and they are all downtown outside. I was told about this by one of my host mom´s friends, and then she and I went and saw them the next day. He made the hands and feet super large, so they are out of proportion, in order to be able to see them, and the gestures they make from far away (at least that is what I was told).
Once pasta has cooled to a luke warm, add all ingredients, and salt and pepper to taste. Serve warm or cold.
more than a couple
stay starry-eyed 'til the last expectation
Knitting patterns. Are these yours, cos they're not mine. So Eighties. I did actually persuade someone to knit me that checkerboard style jumper. I wore it to death. It was blue and pink. I *know*. My taste is dubious. But it was the 80s and none of us had taste, right?
Highlights: Sass&Bide's riot of colour, tribal prints and conical hats. Bora Aksu's powerful collection of outfits for warrior women - heavy layering, sci-fi inspired structures and lots of grey/silver lifted with spurts of metallic green.
10. Favorite cupcake flavor? red velvet, vanilla and my awesome cocoa-white chocolate chip-raspberry.
At 6pm I was finally ready to push. I pushed for an hour and a half. The last half hour was grueling and very painful. I was convinced my epidural was not working to it's full advantage (confirmed afterwards by my doctor). I don't remembering opening my eyes that last half hour. But I kept hearing 'she has hair- dark hair' Keep pushing she's almost here! You're so close! In the back of my mind I didn't really want to push- it hurt too bad. But I knew I had to so each push I gave it my all. I had a lot of support. My hubby, mom, and best friend were in the room along with two nurses and my doctor. Even though it seemed like a lot of people, everyone was relaxed and calm- which was my pre-labor hopes.
The next day, and every day after, he would call in the morning. Email throughout the day and call at night. We talked about sex, relationships, everyday shit..blah, blah, blah. It was cool. Now, when I first met him, because of his forwardness, I had assumed that this guy was trying to be a smash-buddy. That would have been absolutely fine by me. But, the way dude presented himself was as if he was trying to explore the options of something more. No labels had been established, though he did offer the information that I was the first chick he slept with in nearly a year (which I didn't believe at the time, and still don't believe now) and even went so far as to send me song lyrics and shit trying to get in my head.
‘For Asda to play petty politics at a time that we are celebrating the Queen’s Diamond Jubilee, a time of national unity and celebration will leave a great many people deeply offended. ‘I for one won’t be shopping at Asda if that is the game they are going to play.’
“Damn it, no!” the gravely voice barked cantankerously, “Bring me an A-5312! How many times do I have to tell you, A-5312, not A-5315 you idiot!”
Oh Happy Day.
What We Eat
Saw this house in 2003, 2004 when it sold in the $4 million range, now it’s asking $8. According to the listing, the new owners performed extensive renovations in 2004 and I’m sure they must have since they want to double what they paid. Two acres of great lawn, a fantastic old charmer and Lauder is close to town, so you’ve got location, property and the house all going for you. The town assessor calculates its market value as $3.898 million but what does he know?
How can you use these insights in a personal experience piece? In a how-to article? In a marriage article? In an article about friendships? In fiction? In a meditation/devotional? In poetry?
Enter Kati, of Daisy Decals. She and her Mom have a new Etsy shop that specializes in selling retro and vintage decals. I fell in love with Daisy Decals when I found out they are a mother daughter duo (a stay at home mom & a struggling college student). I have been both of these things and so I can completely relate! Then, I actually got a peak at their designs and they are darling. They sent me my favorite, which was the vintage camper. And they sent me an extra one to boot, a cute retro flower decal they are still in the process of working with!
Start by threading the needle with a length of cotton. It's meant to be about 18", but I must admit, I make it as long as possible, so I don't have to re-thread so often :) Tie a single knot in the end (you may need a double knot if using a thinner thread). Insert the needle about an inch away from where you want to start quilting, going through the top layer and batting (but not the backing fabric!) and bring the needle up where you want to start quilting.
I have feeling myself.. all people have feelings, right? You too..
Total High Sold: $5535500
And He said unto me, My grace is sufficient for thee: for my strength is made perfect in weakness.
A couple of months ago we started working with Drambuie. The aim - to introduce a new generation of people to this unique drink. For a lot of people, Drambuie is a vague memory that lives at the back of their parents' (or grandparents') drinks cabinet, brought out once a year at Christmas. Or worse still, they haven't heard of it at all.
This week I went and saw Trans Siberian Orchestra. I love them. They are amazing. If you haven't heard of them, you are missing something. They take traditional classical music and arrange them with Hard Rock rifts, guitars, drums and back up singers. Their arrangements and original music combined with classic music is mind blowing. That's right – MIND BLOWING. You can't help but become the rock fan you were meant to be.
didn’t really know what it really did
I also think this album is more commercial than the artsy The Open Door. "What You Want," "Sick," and "Oceans" are all cool hard rockers designed for radio airplay. My favorite songs are probably "Swimming Home," an ethereal ballad and "Say You Will" - a hook filled bonus track from the deluxe edition. Seriously, people, what's with leaving some of the best tracks as bonuses? If I had my way I would have swapped out "My Heart is Broken" and "Lost in Paradise" for "Say You Will" and "Disappear." Don't get me wrong, I enjoy Evanescence but it's definitely not breaking any new ground.
3M say that their new Scotchgard Stone Protector can cut your maintenance costs on stone floors to 1/6th of your present costs. Furthermore if you are currently buffing on a daily basis you should be able to reduce this to weekly. Apparently the product will never need stripping again, which has huge potential for additional savings.
Hello and good Morning. I hope you are having a fabulous weekend. Unfortunately I have caught a bad virus from my hubby. He had a fever the other day and I guess by the time I realized he was sick, I had already been exposed. So I am not feeling so great. I do have a card to share with you using the newest colors from CR84FN.
Once a century, one person is chosen for greatness.
One of Sebastian Seung’s analogies for the connectome is a plate of spaghetti: just as each plate of spaghetti is uniquely “wired,” its noodles bending and touching at definite points but not others, so each brain’s noodly neurons are also uniquely wired, bending and touching at definite points but not others.
One day, I was watching a series and the actor was trying to please his girlfriend to bake her favourite Almond Fennel Biscotti. So I thought I would like to give it a try using fennel in my biscotti. And herewith, this is the recipe though I don't find much good texture in it. But who knows, you may like it!
I’m so glad I did it but every step I took I wanted to give up. I got to the first mile marker and couldn’t help but think: That was only a mile. I’m done. I want to go home and go back to bed! I can’t do 5 and a half more miles. I’ll surely die!
2559 N. Downer Ave.
A very small cozy wood-paneled restaurant in the old part of Nürnberg. To enter Essigbrätlein you need to use a doorbell and well inside this 450-year old establishment only 20 seats are available so an advanced booking is recommended for this 2-star (Guide Michelin) Restaurant.
His burning ears are heckled
A couple of weeks later, Tiffany was on a plane to Cartagena, Colombia… she arrived a day early and spent time marveling over the amazing colonial city that lies within the walled fortress that once protected the cities inhabitants. She feasted to her heart's content on cocadas, pescado, and arroz de coco and drank limonada and cola y pola and all of her favorite colombian treats…
and more art regularly!!
Now, what would street food be without desert? I met my beautiful friend Licia and she shared her elephant ear with me. Thank you Licia. But, my favorite desert UO offered is Red Wagon Creamery’s delicious handmade ice cream. Their flavor combinations are twisty and unique. www.redwagoncreamery.com
I would like to explain something to you if you didn't already know it (but my readers are pretty darn smart, so I'm guessing you've already gathered this). As it pertains to food related illnesses, gluttony, laziness, and greed are what will kill you. Eventually. Sound harsh? It shouldn't; it's a fact, like it or not. Those diseases are the result of a collective effort from every human involved in our food supply, from Them right on down to Us. It's not the food. Food fuels life; without it, none of us would even exist. Human choices are what leads to illness and untimely death.
Each book of the Bible has activities that make God’s Word more relevant than ever. And, of course, because it was developed for Faithgirlz! readers, they can expect to find it jam-packed with customized content and artwork that really makes the Bible stand out. Girls will love the cool design, the interactive features and the feeling of knowing that God’s Word is there for them whenever they need it. Some of the features included are:
Another mobile post, we are in need of a router, which we will be getting this week, so once that's acquired, everything will be back to normal.
Pick up tail, and working with the tail and the thread together, Ch 3. Drop tail.
Zettai Kareshi
Anyway, here's a few examples of some versions of the Charlie's Angels theme....
"Wanna hear the rest of the story?" he asked me.
Here is a list of the programs I found online. Benefits and pay of each program varies; I’ve included links for more information. I didn’t look in depth at all programs, but if you’re interested I suggest trying to find a blog by someone already in the program and ask them questions (or just read their blog for more information). Some programs also have their own forums which can contain answers to any other questions you might have.
The community grew and flourished economically, but whites in the remainder of Tulsa were not only jealous, but afraid of what Black prosperity meant for their own growth potential.
I also tried to keep it nice and tidy.
At the dance, Enid apologises to Elizabeth and they make up. Elizabeth then spreads a rumour that Jessica is hot for nerdball Winston Egbert, the other nominee for Fall Dance King, so Jessica gets crowned Queen and to her horror, Winston is announced as King, and not Bruce like she expected. That's it. Elizabeth strikes again. Retaliation is definitely not her strong point. Oh and Miss Dalton turns up at the dance, has a bop with fellow hot teacher Mr. Collins and everyone just gets on with their lives with no need for an investigation into the salacious and potentially career-destroying rumour that was buzzing around. Yay sexy Miss Dalton!
KENTUCKY PIE
10. For a Thousand Mothers.
Large churches can also host big events. One of the most amazing took place last Friday evening, when former world super-middleweight champion Nigel Benn came with his wife Carolyne, to give their life story. I think most of us there were expecting to hear boxing tales – but instead we heard about how their lives had been turned around completely.
We’ve always been me and you
Really, there are no clunkers on the nine tracks here, and when the "la la la"s appear on the finale "I Feel Love" it hits the spot perfectly, just like that scoop of ice cream you get with a slice of hot apple pie.
Here's their 'catchy' email:
My grandmother was special!! And she received various accolades from different entities and persons expressing such. She was a sweet and warm person. Hardworking. Kind. Tender-hearted. Warm-hearted… and she loved to see others happy…. And she just the absolute sweetest…
The gold winning German team included Daniela Thoms Anschutz, Stephanie Beckert, Anna Friesinger-Postma, and Katrin Mattscherodt. Japan's silver team consisted of Masako Hozumi, Maki Tabata, and Nao Kodaira. And Poland beat out the US for the bronze! Two US skaters, Jennifer Rodriguez and Jilleanne Rookard, crossed the finish line before the Poland team. But third US skater Catherine Raney-Norman was far behind, having run out of energy and exhausted. The Poland team was able to cross all three skaters before Catherine Raney-Norman crossed the line. The bronze Poland team included Katarzyna Bachleda-Curus, Katarzyna Wozniak, and Luiza Zlotkowksa.
Couscous, Onions, Tomatoes & Fish Broth
This race was only about finishing. So for some reason I RAN through my first meet-up w/them. Hilarious.
So lots of my time has been spent in the Elder Scrolls universe. Mainly Skyrim. And there has been some code that someone found in one of the new patches that suggests what could be lying in wait in the Expansion. Snow Elves! You know those darn elves that were once a prominent race amongst the rest of Skyrim. Well they could be making a comeback and that comeback could be in the form of an Expansion Pack. As well as MF’n Crossbows! I for one would be stoked to have a crossbow. That’s just me though.
…that I’m a little nervous about taking a 5 ½ hour car trip with a 3 year old by myself.
Now, that's souper!!!
I have been a supporter of Deb Matthews since she accepted this portfolio; which was handed to her by David Calplan in absolute shambles. Her failure, however, to accept some responsibility for this outrage is unacceptable. Who else but the Minister in charge of a portfolio is responsible for that portfolio? To say that there is a lot of blame to go around is to skirt the issue of responsibility.
Once on terra firma, your lodging choices range from low budget and funky to elegant and manicured. If long hours of lazing with a novel in a shady swing or dangling a pole from a private dock appeals to you, try one of the casual, offbeat seaside motels. Many offer outdoor grills for roasting the day’s catch and bikes to ride to town if the fish aren’t biting. More upscale tourists might opt instead for one of the quaint historic inns or B&Bs.
At least that’s what he told himself as he walked to the beauty salon.
- I went to Louisiana with my sister and some friends! It was amazing! Now I can say I've been to 33 states! -
And I made the payment soon after and was verified by them.
This is an update to this post.
♥ dancing
I first picked up Edge in a bookstore because of the unique cover treatment. There was an end-dump with books from Angry Robot ( a press I had not heard of) and this one had a cover design that was nearly all words--so much so that the title is a little difficult to distinguish the title. The cover described what can only be described as a "Running Man" type scenario with knife fights and sudden death.
In 1656, Flavel accepted a call to be minister in the thriving seaport of Dartmouth. He earned a smaller income there, but his work was more profitable; many were converted. One of his parishioners wrote of Flavel, “I could say much, though not enough of the excellency of his preaching; of his seasonable, suitable, and spiritual matter; of his plain expositions of Scripture; his talking method, his genuine and natural deductions, his convincing arguments, his clear and powerful demonstrations, his heart-searching applications, and his comfortable supports to those that were afflicted in conscience. In short, that person must have a very soft head, or a very hard heart, or both, that could sit under his ministry unaffected” (Erasmus Middleton, Evangelical Biography, 4:50-51). read more….
Well, folks, I realize that I've got to officially announce that I'm putting the Love Train on hiatus for an indefinite period. I truly enjoy the experience of writing here, and I've been fortunate to interact with so many bright, fascinating fellow weirdos in this little corner of the web.
Light.
"That's okay," he said. "Ask away."
Here is my final little school of fish, ready to chomp the poor worm. It's super cute and super simple. I hope I've inspired you to doodle a little something for yourself.
Eventually, what with all the stress of a nosy audience and, well, FIGHTING while laboring, we noticed Mama Cow wasn't progressing. With each push, the calf's hooves would emerge, but after each contraction was over they'd recede back in. And Mama Cow would again stand up, ask if any other cows wanted a piece of her, and gaze at me as if to say, "Can't you DO something?" before lying down again with the next contraction.
Rubicon Ranch, the collaborative novel I’m doing with some other Second Wind authors, is all about family. The birth family who’s been searching for the girl and who fall prey to con artists, the couple who wanted a child so bad that they kidnapped one, the old man who suspects his son of the crime, the woman who suspects her father, the boy who is being abused by his father, the sleepwalker who is still haunted by his dead sister, the woman who is grieving for her dead philandering husband. It’s interesting how the theme of family has evolved in such an extemporaneous project. We never planned this theme, but each of us separately chose to deal somehow with family skeletons.
We were so lucky to have been a part of this beautiful couples special day!
The Ready to Pop favors ordered from Jennifer at Scissors and Spatulas, were a big hit! Jennifer was a pleasure to work with, and I would highly recommend her if you want to order these. (I used her white chocolate covered popcorn recipe to fill mine.) She was able to find paper that was in keeping with our jungle baby shower theme, because she's thoughtful like that!
B. The week leading up to the death had been filled with important events.
4 deep
a better flavor.”
In a row across the center of the wrapper, place 2 shrimp halves, a handful of vermicelli, carrots, basil, mint, cilantro, and lettuce, leaving about 2 inches uncovered on each side. Top with 1/8th of the chopped peanuts. Fold the uncovered sides inward, then tightly roll the wrapper. Repeat with the remaining rolls to make 8 rolls total.
The real world really isn’t all it is cracked up to be. Paying bills sucks and for that reason I thought I should give myself a little challenge.
The patterned paper, cardstock and ribbon are all from the Loyal Project Pantry Kit. I added some brads from my stash for another accent. The sentiment, "Grill Master" was stamped in Memento Bamboo Leaves and I cut it out and popped it up with Foam Tape onto the focal panel.
Mississippi- you see these folks going for Willard?
He had the ring
And I'm supposed to care that a few Taliban were
So which, you may ask, was our first app? The all important FLASHLIGHT, of course! Great for those times when you don't have a flashlight handy but need a little burst of light (or, in this case, a strobe). After all, isn't this why we carry a phone?! (Technology - ain't it grand?)
(Disclaimer: the thoughts expressed here are mine and mine alone, and do not necessarily reflect those of Wesley Theological Seminary or PC(USA))
BUT as we value his help in them attaching and all that, would it be horrible to leave him? we'd have a good place for him, and it could even be temporary, just til we get back (which will probably be years).
This dish was super yummy, I think the key was the Basil. I don’t like mushy carrots, so I did not include carrots or the celery in my recipe. It was super easy to make and I am thinking of making the sauce separately for pasta because it was that good. There are 4 servings, at 4 Plus points each. They do say you can add some whole wheat penne pasta 2/3 cups for 2 more points.
I enjoy reading about the boldness and determination of the two blind men who paid no attention to the crowd telling them to be quiet. Actually they shouted all the louder, as they called out to the Lord for help. Jesus responded by asking them a question. Jesus knew exactly what they wanted. He also knew what they needed, yet He took time to ask them, “What do you want me to do for you?” He’d just taught the disciples about service. (Matthew 20:20-28) The lesson continued with His example. He could have simply given the blind men what He knew they needed most, but instead He took the time to ask them about what they wanted.
We still don't know what doll she will teach or what the cost will be. There is a lot of interest from outside the doll club of people interested in taking the class so Leta is a very popular doll artist designer.
So, Reagan nor you had a truly balanced budget because the national debt goes up, and that’s what we pay the interest on. So I think you’ve stretched that a little bit more than you should have.
In the MLSP archive, you will find more than two hundred videos. You can choose to watch all those videos, and it won’t cost you thousands of dollars. For starters, you can begin with paying the starting fee of $29.97. Don’t rush in learning all the secrets. Take your time so the ideas will surely sink into your system, so you can apply them to your own business. Once you’ve made MLSP your marketing tool, you will have no regrets.
13. Sticks & Stones
This award comes with three rules. 1) Thank the person who gave it to you and link back to them in your post. 2) Share 7 things about yourself. 3) Pass this award on to 15 recently discovered blogs.
darkness and light
However, Gautam Duggad, analyst, Prabhudas Lilladher, sees lower consumer confidence leading to weakening in SSS growth and lack of visible operating leverage as major risk.
On 2 May 2004 history was made when Christians from all 56 nations of Africa participated in the first ever continental Day of Repentance and Prayer for Africa. Numerous communities, villages, towns and cities united in non-denominational prayer gatherings at different venues. In South Africa 277 communities participated. A flame of prayer was burning in Africa!
I think that's pretty darn neat.
Blitzen Ale - Maumee Bay Brewing
Denied! At the time my books are set – 1862-63 – cartridges were brand new. Most guns needed to be painstakingly loaded with black powder, cap, ball and wad. (I've tried this, too.) With this kind of ammo, misfires are common. When you DO hit something they often set the victim's clothes on fire. How often do we see that in movies? In old westerns, a bullet means instant death. In reality people often survived after being shot multiple times. That myth I can bust. Accounts of real historical shootouts are exciting, shocking and sometimes even amusing.
The issue of weight bears too much on every persons psyche nowadays. There is no turn or twist that does not remind man of food or his physique. The society that men live in is ironic, reminding one minute then reprimanding the next.
You may or may not have noticed that the ruling class throws around our money like wedding attendees throw rice. Case in point: Injustice Department Flings Our Money to the Four Winds
‘Great leaking buckets of water, Richard! You’re not wearing your stockings.’
Let say if the Perbadanan Kelantan is led by a person of in-law to Chua Soi Lek, and he sponsors Datuk Chua for a vacation to Italy (coz I really want to go to Rome) worht RM60 000. And plus, he uses the money for gambling. Will you say it is a corruption?
You want to know why I hunt?
someone unfortunate without housing; poor people who unfortunately do not have a home to live in; carries all thier possessions with her in shopping bags; people without possessions or wealth; without nationality or citizenship; “stateless persons” ; not settled or established; “an unsettled lifestyle”…
2. Promoting production and manufacturing in Iceland
I am 6 weeks post surgery. Life is sort of getting back to normal. It took longer than I thought it would. It has been a whirlwind of emotion and experiences, and I hope to settle down and get grounded for a bit.
* Robert Gibbs (Director, Jackman Humanities Institute, UofT).
Monday: CW (catholic workout) starting at 5pound weights
As if such colors could not fly.
Site founder Bill Middlebrook’s next challenge? It might be asking a bit much, but some of us might clamor for a 13ers.com app soon.
There’s a reason why American Idol works, and you know what they say, if it’s not broken, don’t fix it. AI has a Top 12 (or 13). If there was one good thing about X-Factor it was that it had a Top 12. Does The Voice have a top 12? No. It doesn’t. It has a Top Who Knows What. I mean, if you have to rely on the term “quarter finals” for your show, you’re doing it wrong. There are other things that The Voice could learn from a show that’s been going strong for 11 years, but this is the most important. We can’t care about the show if we don’t care about the contestants. And we can’t care about the contestants if we have to wait several weeks in between their performances.
Now a social studies teacher at a middle school in Seymour, Conn., Deb credits Mr. D'Aquila as being one of the people who most inspired her career choice.
I have a couple of very immature vices - I love what Americans call soft-serve ice-cream (we call them cones or 99s if they have a chocolate flake stuck in them - mine always have the flake, all else is sacrilige). I eat chocolate and sugar in amounts that would sicken the average child and send the average adult into a sugar coma. I have no plans to ever stop travelling (definitely not just for the young!) and age has not, so far, given me a taste for 'mature civilised person' alcoholic drinks like wine and whiskey. I still like my vodka drowned in Coke or OJ or, ideally, replaced entirely with peach schnapps.
I did not expect her to do detailed research into whether Kannada’s Bhukailasa came first or Telugu’s Bhukailas came first. Or to investigate whether Gopikrishna’s dance was reshot or just inserted.
On another blog there is a great collection of artsy pages. Some make me sad for insulting the person who landed there. It's probably the webmaster's fault they're there. One insults the reader for having guessed, while mine compliments them on having guessed (because I'm trying to make mine guessable, for the most part).
Make your husband a big ugali that he cannot finish. As everyone knows, the way to a man’s heart is through his stomach. Avoid snacks like rice and green grams as such meals put an African man off. Even if you make him some rice, make an even bigger plate of ugali and serve him. Make sure you serve him a huge bowl of sweet potatoes and a full flask of tea after his main meal.
The second nerd nodded approvingly, “Good choice. The clothes probably wouldn’t have fit.”
Anyway, thank goodness for EC because that would NOT have been fun to clean up. His second poop was modest and we caught that later in the day and wasn’t nearly as interesting and it was done in one go. When Daddy Man got home Moose had been eating non stop for an hour and so peed like crazy for the first 30 minutes of the hand off, had a giant poop that exploded out of the sumo prefold while I was at work. He ate some more, then fell asleep for 3 1/2 hours I was told. So I was home 30 minutes before I took him for a nice wee before we came to bed. Itty Bitty was kind of stir crazy and Daddy Man was in a mood when I got home.
Producing excess food under the present dangerous conditions in the countryside also has many farmers pull out and sell up - especially after the farmer or a member of his household has been murdered. It clearly is increasingly difficult for these farmers to continue producing food while large numbers of armed gangs from the cities endanger their families and attack their homesteads. putting their farms under virtual siege.
And he said: "Absolutely." And he knelt down in front of her again.
Why change? all my kids in college and doing real good.
I know some people experience it as a huge time suck – just one more addictive, inadequacy-inspiring corner of the whole addictive, inadequacy-
Black inkpad used to distress edges
Alright, so let's take a look at the first line of The Blind Assassin:
It is hard to ignore a chance to play around with the world’s first camera phone with a 41MP sensor.So when we got a chance for a hands-on experience, you can be sure we were not lagging behind. The 808 PureView looks similar to its predecessor, the N8. The front is dominated by the 4-inch bright touch display, while the back highlights the camera lens. Here the 41MP stands out on the embossed lens cover that hides the sensor.
So funny you should post this. I saw a recipe for Kaya on another blog about a week ago and I had never heard of it, so of course I had to try it. The recipe is a bit different, using whole eggs and yolks, canned coconut milk... I thought it was good, although I couldn't get it quite thick enough. Very fun, though! I may have to try this recipe now :)
On the other hand, a new six-bedroom home with eight baths with tidal waterfront in the Belle Haven section of Greenwich, has not sold after 17 months on the market. In Mr. Pruner’s estimation, the current price of $16.7 million, though down from the original $17.9 million, is still “astronomical” given that the back of the 2.3-acre property is roughly 100 yards from Interstate 95.
The simple answer is that I was not motivated. Writing a daily blog takes a lot out of you, and my heart was not in the right place to continue. Instead I decided to write a blog post whenever I felt like it.
Levine's partner, Paul, seems better at the project than she was, and one wonders if he should have written the book. Bizzarely, he ranks only 3rd in the list of acknowledgements. If indeed it is the same Paul. We are told on p. 203 that Paul fixes the sink for $4.60 (would normally have cost $100), and Judith's watch band. At the end of this paragraph, Judith says "I get a little thrill from each of these repairs, like a runner wringing fifty more meters from her exhausted body". Exactly what Judith contributed in either of these cases is not detailed.
My daughter Dream is turning sixteen today. Dream is really a dream daughter, I'm very proud to be her mother.
I was extremely puzzled by this when I first found out and simply did not understand the problem. Then I saw a link on his Twitter feed explaining the situation further, so naturally I read and then everything made sense.
Check for the crispness and sprinkle the chilli-salt mix on top immediately while the falis are warm.
This is a thought we had daily over the past 1 1/2 years as our business was struggling. We started the business to do good in our community, not to make a living for ourselves. We followed what we thought was a path that God had laid out for us. When we first started, doors opened wide and flew open quickly. Things happened so easily that we never doubted that our venture was blessed by God.
But if Obama's support in 2012 is dropping among all groups that backed him in 2008, he's running out of margin for error.
ice cream trucks, bike rides, and
There is something about it that is so pure, untouched — unqualified even. In the history of man, very little has been done to corrupt, or even direct the energy here, and so it can be a little difficult to work with. It is very still and unmoving and it is used to being still — it is an uncertain energy. It is tentative, having had little experience with outside direction or foreign influence.
Now, here it is...
when they were no longer able to carry out the dead bodies of the poor, they
The Archives of Sexual Behavior has published my paper, “Children’s Gender and Parents’ Color Preferences,” as an online-first article. The abstract is up here, but the paper is paywalled — let me know if you’d like one of my personal copies and I’ll be glad to send it to you.
But verses 43 and 44 are rather strange as we consider Jesus’ reaction and the leper’s reaction. You would think Jesus would encourage the leper to go out and proclaim what he had done, so his fame could be multiplied. But this is not what happened. Jesus sternly charged, that is, he is “strongly discouraged” the man to spread word of what had happened. Jesus encouraged the leper to go to the priest and offer for your cleansing what Moses commanded, for a proof to them. What this tells us is that Jesus wants to see that the Mosaic Law is respected. Whereas the religious leaders of the day have corrupted the Mosaic Law, Jesus wants to see it esteemed. This idea of going to the priest is taken from Leviticus 14 where there is a procedure to be followed for the leprous person for the day of his cleansing. So, a leper had to go through this process in order to be pronounced clean.[10] Jesus wanted him to do this for a proof or a testimony to them. But what kind of testimony? There is a positive and negative testimony. What Jesus meant, as we consider the context of this somber passage, is a testimony against the rulers and priests of the day. This is not Jesus wanting to give their system credit; this is Jesus’ way of condemning their system. What is Jesus doing by sending this man to the priest? Jesus is saying that “if the priests establish that healing has taken place and accept the sacrifice for cleansing but fail to recognize the person and power through whom healing has come, they will stand condemned by the very evidence which they have supplied.”[11] The healing testifies to something new that God is doing in history, and if they reject this they will be judged.[12] The priests have become bad theologians, but they still must bear with the facts.
Right says they, we need to box / bag/ favour boxes, with templates, written instructions, hints tips and on a wedding/spring/easter theme.
warm
High school students also protested again demanding.. nothing terribly specific.. I think free transport was on the list at one point. The note I read today mentioned “sector reform” and “improved conditions for students”. Not terribly convincing, makes them look like just another wannabe movement.
New York-based artist Eric Cahan created his Sky Series at a carefully chosen hour of morning or evening during his extensive travels.
The flesh and nerves of a strange ethereal joy
MTN Group Ltd. (MTN), Africa’s largest wireless operator, bribed officials, arranged meetings between Iranian and South African leaders, and promised Iran weapons and United Nations votes in exchange for a license to provide mobile-phone service in the Islamic Republic, Turkcell Iletisim Hizmetleri AS (TCELL) alleged in a lawsuit.
Now I need to clarify here.
If I could go back I would try
2 tablespoons hoisin sauce
“A poem is never finished, only abandoned.” – Paul Valery
My alcohol imbibing over 72 hours included, um...let's see...beer (good and bad,) wine (red and white,) Bloody Marys, margaritas, sidecars, and pina coladas. Oh, and there was that misbegotten and short-lived whim of trying a Bud Light mixed with Clamato. It was so awful that I think I would have liked it better if it had had actual, literal ass chunks mixed up in there.
Again, another issue I still deal with, but it's one of the most important. It's also one that I keep coming back to. So often I feel like I think I know best or that if I am not in control of the situation it will fall apart. (Talk about an ego, right?) The truth is, letting go and giving it all to God not only takes so much weight off your shoulders, but it also leads you in the right direction. It's incredibly hard to let go though, especially if you are a control freak like me. But hey, maybe that's what makes it so wonderful when you finally can.
(8) Mary Smith
Down the rabbit hole and through the looking glass it's time for your daily dose of crazy!
I could not have daughters of my own but I decided that I could still care for many of India’s neglected daughters. And so began my personal effort which continues to this day. I help girls from poor families whenever I can. I give them books, clothes and other things and encourage them to study and make their own mark in society. All 3 of my cook’s daughters have completed their graduation, done courses in computers etc and now have good jobs. They save their money and don’t abide by old customs like dowry.
Thanks for playing along with the 4 Crafty Chicks!
They resist captivity. They get up and go. They seek better worlds."
One woman told of her friend who’d been evacuated, but went back to her home time and again for things she remembered and couldn’t live without. Happily, she had a home to go back to and was able to get out safely.
If you were born in the 80’s chances are that eventually you had a computer class. In this class, sitting behind what were slow and ancient machines that required things called ‘floppy disks’. At some point in your young adult life you probably came across what is perhaps the best game of all time: The Oregon Trail.
But back to Bâri′.
After the initial shock and adjustment to the daily reality of gluten-free living, the celiac’s ongoing challenge lies in searching hidden gluten in ingredients and recognizing its myriad sources. English muffins and frosted donuts are obvious no-no’s. But gluten may hide in such unlikely places as soy sauce, veggie burgers and herbal tea. It is a common additive in broth, bouillon, spice blends and prepared soups. It may also lurk in vitamins, medications and lip balm.
So let the battered old willow
Currently, Hilda, Celia, Vera and Gladys are all broody. Hilda has had two trips to the broody cage, and remains stubbornly fluffed up. Under normal circumstances I'd persevere until she snapped out of it, but we're heading away to the Lake District tomorrow so she will have to stay in the palace and growl at the chicken sitter. It's official ladies and gentlemen, the broodies have won.
she looked for the first time at the
Already hit the "Gonna Git Down" Austinist party for some BBQ and Lunch Beers...and now a keg of Live Oak Pale Ale has shown up at the office for our March Madness Party.
My gardening buddy Emma served us a Mrs Cropley cake yesterday. She baked a carrot cake without carrots. Instead she substituted grated sweet potato, courgette and celery in the missing ingredient’s place. I would have said that sweet potato and courgette made sense but celery? Emma had never ventured into carrot cake before but as she hadn’t any carrots in the house she used what was in her fridge. It was a huge success! As odd as it may seem the celery disappeared into the flavour creating a moist and delicious cake. Hoorah for you Emma! Hoorah for the Mrs Cropley school of baking! Hoorah for using what she had instead of driving 14 miles to buy what little the recipe told her to use wasting time and precious petrol to buy a few carrots. Well done Emma.
1 tsp - ghee
At least five people will face charges in the hazing death of a Florida A&M University band member aboard a bus after a performance in Orlando last fall, authorities said Tuesday.
I met 'Rain and Mare, who are cousins, in 1976 when I was a sixteen year-old exchange student with the American Field Service (AFS). Although I was an American citizen, AFS selected me to represent Barbados and I spent a year attending 12th grade at Euclid High School in Euclid, Ohio. I had already graduated from high school in Barbados but attending 12th grade was part of the deal. Anyway, I made some great friends during that year in Ohio, with 'Rain and 'Mare being a big part of the core group I hung out with. I have not seen these "girls" since we were 18 or 19, when they came to visit me in Barbados during the summer of 1978. I was really looking forward to catching up!
This volume combines simplicity and applicability without forfeiting precision. The authors lead the reader into the full girth of the many contemporary discussions concerning the defense of Christianity. They offer several of the leading arguments for Christian theism while toppling some of the most belligerent of the objections promoted by the New Atheists. They have written, with abundant care, to attain a thoroughness that is not often established in popular books. The wisdom and excellence with which each chapter is written makes this a crucial volume for the budding apologist’s library.
· Built-in visuals which include a suite of visual enhancements that provide everything you need to enjoy a smooth, seamless, stunning experience on your PC
A pulse in the eternal mind, no less
When the cake is ready, pull it out of the oven and let it rest for about 5 minutes.
The random winner of the Legoland tickets is -
Winner: Tie
And erected Guernica from pregnant heart of a broken metaphor
I really enjoyed…
Part I: 3 to 11 PM
Ju 390 A: Transporter
The sign’s other side was scrawled with the message, “Love not Hate.”
Now, I have a hard time focusing on just one project at a time so I also re-organized the nursery, my closet, and one of the attic closets. :) But I didn't take before pictures of those. Oh well. I may dedicate a post to the reorganizing of our room...
He found only two noses had the nose-hole with the splitter and that these wings were only carried parallel to the ground when moved around the pitlane. The final piece of the jigsaw was when he saw a mechanic inspect the wing with his hand leading to understand the slot placement and this information allowed him to work out the system and draw it for the aforementioned magazines. Its remarkable such a tiny detail can be observed and goes to show the hard work that went into Piola exposing this innovation.
Intense pleasure
Numerous studies have shown that social conformity is a value most widely upheld by Hong Kong people, and their sexual attitudes are strongly influenced by the ancient Chinese philosophies of Confucianism and Taoism. Confucian concepts stress the maintenance of social order by everyone conforming to the Rule of Heaven and remands collective uniformity in terms of ideas and behavior. (Ma, 1997, 2003). Taoism, derived chiefly from the book Tao-te Ching (Lao-Tse, 3rd century BC) advocates a contemplative life in accord with nature and a focus on the harmonious unity of heaven and earth.
After three failures of drawing whole, halfs and quarterts of oranges and ending up with totally unrecognizable patterns, I gave up. I just couldn't do the mani I wanted. :(
This corresponds with 1 Corinthians 15:51 where the apostle writes,
I do love the look of them. More wear is needed to break them in.
C: Cartoons – I can never get enough of Tom & Jerry!
And the little we know, we don’t like. Josh Lucas is a cynical gambler and former Navy SEAL who resembles a catalog model. Kurt Russell is a former Mayor of New Yorkand former New Yorkfireman with a really good tan. Emmy Rossum is his pretty daughter who resembles a fashion model. There’s another 6 or 8 like this but it hardly matters; none of them are members of the human race as you or I know it. The original film was about a group of highly imperfect people, people you might not peg as survivors or team players, summoning the strength and the character to go on. They were played by such sex symbols as Shelly Winters, Jack Albertson, Red Buttons and Ernest Borgnine (Marty, for god’s sake). Along the way, you got to know these vulnerable people, like them, and consequently, root for them. Lately modern Hollywood repeatedly makes the mistake of thinking we want to root for invulnerable people, and I hope to God they’re wrong because the technical name for that philosophy is fascism. The modern hero is a vigilante on steroids dispatching dozens of bad guys with an AK-47 (or in the case of Poseidon it’s Josh Lucas leaping 100 feet through a burning oil slick into the water beneath in order rig a special rescue device with a fire hose). But in my book, if the hero is superman the stakes are zero. And why on earth is Kurt Russell a former New York Mayor? It is as though the creators, perceiving that they could not write any characters we could like, opted to replace them with symbolic shorthand for concepts with high Q score. It scans more like a football playbook than what you would call a script. But, contrary to popular belief, you need a script. Without one, all sorts of moral questions go unasked. Stay or go? Live or die? Help the hopeless or save myself? At one point in Poseidon, Richard Dreyfus, as a gay millionaire, is forced to shake off a man who is clinging to his legs for dear life over a burning precipice. Once accomplished, this action, which would be traumatic for any person with a conscience, is never referred to in the film again. This is not good. In these treacherous times, the cinema – all culture – has a role to play in helping us process new realities, and in helping us as citizens of a presumably democratic nation to think and decide the questions of the day. Questions with life-and-death implications for all of us. In light of this, the question on everyone’s lips should not be, “Are we ready for Flight 93?” (we undoubtedly are), but “Are we still able to stomach Poseidon?” Me, I was puking over the rail.
I looked over the autopsy report, noticed that Rob had advanced hardening of the arteries which for a young man of 47 was not good. He also had a kidney stone. At some point in early December 2000, or maybe even November, Rob had been in exruciating pain and had gone to the hospital to see what was wrong. They did all sorts of tests but found nothing. Turns out it was the kidney stone.
These are important issues but they are issues that are already dealt with, within the law. They should be taught as part of a course on citizen rights under the law, not as separate pieces of a whole. This does more to ideologically divide racial groups in culture than any isolated incident. This puts people into categories of special privilege. Agree or disagree with me on the impropriety of teaching this. Either way, it is a matter of special privilege.
I made mine in shades of orange, red and yellow, but I think it would also look pretty in shades of green. Here it the free pattern for my autumn garland.
And that's where we got cut off, never making it to Uncle Billy's. Not enough time on the bus schedule to make it there and then back north.
I watched the Sunday Night program on Channel 7 on March 11, 2012. I was particularly interested in the segment on Sweet Poison, though not for the same reason I purchased Gillespie’s book. This was more because I love Jamie Oliver and wanted to see him interviewed. What I saw that night turned the wheels into motion. Here is the story info on their website. I found the whole segment fascinating and frightening. Was sugar really that addictive? If so, did that mean it was possible that I was addicted? (As I sat munching on a few squares of Cadbury Old Gold). I was hooked and wanted to know more.
14. (Let Me) Live and Love Tonight
We’ve also seen that idea turned sideways, such as Brawns 2009 snowplough, also copied in 2010 by Williams. A curved transverse vane is fitted across the splitter. This is a blunt solution, as the vane catches the airflow literally like a snowplough, sending a strong vortex to increase the pressure ahead of the floor.
The Doctor's interrogation by Governor Lobo is a great scene. Hartnell puts in a great performance here in the triumph of the Doctor's will.
Many people ask "Do I need a Wristband?". The answer is no. You can pay cover at clubs if there is room after the wristbands and badges have gone in. Cover can be anywhere from $5 to $45.
And I feel them
I take the back roads to and from just about anywhere if I can, so on the drive back from Lockhart to Houston I drove southeast down FM 713 to I-10.
In the early years, we bought our daughters matching outfits and dressed them alike for our outings. I don’t remember at what age they declared “no more,” but I can’t help that I miss the sweet young faces of our daughters in their matching outfits gracing our trip photos. These days, we tend to buy matching t-shirts at one place or another.
I welcome thee, Katherine!
And that leads me to my question. Which is more annoying:
The papers are a designer digi set I bought a while ago especially to use on a card for Rachel as she loves the pink and black combination. These are gorgeous papers and I think they will get plenty of use in the future. Some black lace, pearls, ribbon, a flower and pins complete the card.
Sentence Begin: 05/23/1998
- Please only submit one entry (unless you use a Little Miss Muffet Stamps image) and it would be helpful if you could turn off word verification.
That's right people, motivational speaker... You betta recognize.
I'll be adding more to the list soon.
I got to London early last Wednesday morning. That gave me three days to find out where exactly I was going for the show, let jet lag wear off, and be a tourist.
But the video of Katy Perry for the song Fireworks impressed me. The mix of the lyrics with the images made me cry. ( I am very sensitive)
Ryan loves the new Leap Frog farm animal magnet toy he got for Christmas -especially the music it plays. I was able to record him dancing. Off camera Dean is also dancing that's what Ryan is watching. I promised Dean I wouldn't tape him, so you'll just have to believe me when I say seeing him dance was quite the sight as well. I think this video is just under 2 minutes, Ryan quits dancing after about 1:30. Adjust the volume before viewing. Enjoy!
1. My trip to Perth
‘I’m going to get some milk; I feel like some milk’ he said dreamily, stumbling towards the door.
Like a flashing blaze across sunny hills,
Two logistical changes to 100 word song. I will start posting each Tuesday’s installment with 100 Word Song hyphen whatever song is chosen. I’ve been told by a few of you it’s easier to search. Also, I’ll make a blog pages with the other episodes similar to how I have my fiction pieces at the header of the blog. This should provide reference and advertisement for new people.
(it was very quickly put together) it is such an easy flower I am sure you will enjoy making it!!
You know that girl on the cover of the magazine? I do. She’s called Amanda Bynes and starred in Big Fat Liar with the kid who’s now a racecar driver. Frankie Muniz. Thanks, Phoebe!
The tweet was false. She did not make mean comments to Brownback. She did not tell him, in person, that he sucked. He might, in fact, blow a lot, but sweet, innocent Emma probably has no first-hand knowledge of this. She was just blowing smoke up Twitter's collective ass.
I gently and politely brushed the chit chat the driver’s mate was making with me with a smile and quickly zoomed out to get to the La Paz (please this is the suburb in Accra of Ghana) station. As quickly as my legs would allowed, I walked only to be stopped by the call of a woman selling drinks, “Energy drink, energy drink, nkoraa no b3 ko Our day, to bi ma wom (I know my Twi is not good when I write it, I studied Ga and if you don’t know the meaning, here is the translation; Energy drink, energy drink for the children who would go for Our Day, buy some for them).
But the thing that resonates with me most is just Dorothy’s transformation. She was a quiet wallflower, doting on her aunt, uncle and doggie and pretending to be satisfied with her super ordinary life. So much so, the elementary school teacher isn’t even considering a job offer to teach at a high school outside of her Harlem neighborhood.
Army leaders do not want a repeat of the post-Vietnam era, when a “hollow” service spiraled out of control and one Army study concluded it was “close to losing its pride, heart, and soul.”
There's a lot of don't give up in there as I feel that that is the most important piece of advice! If you give up because you keep getting rejections, you will never know if the next piece you would have written would have been the one to get published. And if you're reluctant to try new markets because you think they won't be interested in what you have to write - do it anyway - you won't know until you try. Let the editor be the judge of whether they'll be interested or not. And if you've done your research properly you shouldn't be too far off the mark.
And everyone is worried about the economy; it’s the inbreeding that really matters
The Gerson therapy has been the best known nutritional therapy for cancer. It is available in two clinics in California and Mexico. It consists of a basic vegetarian diet low in salt and fat, with high dosages of particular nutrients using raw fruit and vegetable juices.
When we make our normal evening meal we try to make enough that we can create what's called "The Fifth Meal" (we're a family of four). We package it up in a cool food saver tray that has compartments and a lid and voila... a whole meal we can share with someone.
But here I am, with this nagging feeling in the back of my mind that if Multiculturalism is such a wonderful thing, why exactly do we need surface-to-air missiles to prevent terrorist (from where, I wonder) attacks on the Olympics?
Combine the heavy cream and milk and divide in half, you use 3/4 C. at first then add second portion.
See, Americans, never let it be said I don't love you dearly... I hope you're all having an awesome day celebrating your Independence Day (that *is* what today celebrates, no?) and having BBQs and drinking beer and watching fireworks and everything else that Hollywood tells me you all do religiously on the 4th of July!
But as the week's gone on, Glen Keane's talk keeps coming to mind; things he said and things I observed about his work. Much of it is stuff I should know, or used to know when I was fresh out of college, but somehow got lost along the way. So thanks from the back row, Mr. Keane! And since one of his points was how important it is to share what we know with other artists, here goes:
Now, makers of the documentary have announced that they will be releasing the film without a rating from the Motion Picture Association of America (MPAA) because of their refusal to lower its rating from R to PG-13.
1. Each of my kids thinks that I favor the others over them… and at various times through their life cycles I have favored them. They are all VERY unique individuals. Right now my favorite is my “baby”, Tiffany LeAnn. She is an amazing human being on many levels and I am most proud to be her mom.
7. Let your bread sit for at least 15-30 minutes in the pan after it comes out of oven to finish setting up…then dig in!
Imagine resources
Disc 2: was recorded on 12/13/1980 at Hosei University - its also written on the back cover that this is the incomplete soundboard master for Rallizes experts to label everywhere. Its Fujio years which means its Mizutani, Fujio Yamaguchi on second guitar, Doronco Gummo on Bass and some guy on drums. This is almost an hour long set, so i imagine about 20-30 minutes are missing . . . especially with all the fades that happen to the songs before the listener is done with them. FRUSTRATION!
You know how most Kansas and Missouri wines are...well, they're pleasant enough, but they don't use the same grapes that they use in California (or France, for that matter)?
MAD Open Mic swings ’round once more; again I toss together something last minute and perform it in high style, fingertips a-curl. Inspired by Anne Carson’s Short Talks, which I’ve loved for going on seven years now, plus signifi-quests and murky underwater imagery, whose slip and slime I can’t seem to shake, and so choose to embrace.
That night was the end of my heavy drinking, not because I was overcome with shame—which I wasn’t—but because I couldn’t handle the hangovers anymore. I’ve rarely had more than three drinks at a time in the decades since then, and seldom that many. As I write, I have wine, beer, and even some 190 proof (leftover from a marijuana tincture) in the pantry, but I long ago lost most of my interest in the effects of liquor. I don't miss it.
The peg technique -
Row 3- (1sc in 1sc, 2sc in next sc) (18)
I've been pretty good taking pics over the holidays; I didn't manage it everyday, but I managed almost everyday! Enjoy!!
I have not mastered the task of living in the gray and with every new relationship a hint of existential crisis can be heard echoing in my mind. The “issue” of my bisexuality is always called into question by my significant other and my internalized biphobia. Its true, not a day goes by where I can’t help but wish I could just be straight….Not a day goes by where I can’t help but wish I could just be gay. This negative thinking is quickly squashed by the revelation that I am exactly who I want to be. I am openly bisexual. Living a life I love. Even now, in a serious gay relationship, (for the sake of brevity “gay” is a term you will hear me sometimes use) I will not let go of my bisexual identity because to me it is very important to call into question the suffocating boxes we desire to live in. Yes, we desire to live in them as much as we hate to be placed in them, our need for belonging trumps every time.
I have always meant to do this challenge but Friday nights are our family movie night so often I am busy doing family STUFF!!!! WE have just come home from two weeks at Hervey Bay and I have been in the car with the kids all day so I figured I could sneak off and have a scrap!!!!! I started with the Friday night challenge over at Scraphappy Kats!!
At 1500 points I'm packing 22 lances, 6 splinter cannons, and 3 assault units in the wyches, large wracks & the beastmaster unit. I finding more and more that if I can't de-mech the enemy (through too many enemy vehicles or just bad luck) then I really struggle. Time will tell if I have gone too far (particularly with the few troops).
Click on Veronica's name above/below for more inspiration and leave her some love.
and the milk tip is brimming
Are you planning on buying an air compressor for home or business use? Do you want to know just what to look for when shopping for one? Read on to know the top 5 buying tips in buying an air compressor.
Now I look forward to my run on Saturday at a more normal March temperature — 59 degrees!
9. Zoya Kalista (2)
trees, extensive areas in Asia, Australia, South
Well, here we are. It is 2011. Oh my gosh! It is so hard to believe how fast 2010 went. There were several significant things in my life in 2010.
Looks like I'm at it again ... trying to figure out WHAT I can put together to make another masculine card! I like twill tape ... haven't used it much for years until recently. I got this stuff way-back-in-the-day when Stampin' Up still offered it in the super wide size. I kinda like how this turned out! I have been frantically trying to catch up with all the birthday cards I am behind on. Seems like I have written "Happy Belated Birthday" in LOTS of cards lately!! I think I am up to date again, so I don't need another one until THURSDAY. And it's another DUDE card!! Better get crackin', right?? Another day at the races ... much to do (probably more than I can in one day), so I guess it's time to get rolling on everything, too. Sigh ... what I wouldn't give for a day when I have NOWHERE to go and NOTHIN' to do!!
I thought I would start teaching an element or principle of Interior design every Friday. I am hoping that someone might learn from it. These principles and elements are used by interior designer's everyday to achieve great design. Today were talking about Harmony, unity and variety.
I took those photos on the way back home with the girls. They love picking up flowers. Do you know the name of these flowers? I would love to know. There are hair clips made with a fake version of this flower I’ve seen on girls in Jakarta. I wonder where I can get them. I’m sure I will find a store eventually, but I’m curious.
Of course, there'd be no story if Adoulla actually did retire. Instead, the aging ghul hunter receives a desperate message from his unrequited love, Miri Almoussa, who begs him to look into the murder of her niece and her husband, indicating that "it was neither man nor animal that killed them." Though stung by the fact that Miri did not come to make her request of him in person, Adoulla nevertheless agrees to go on one, last adventure for her sake. He and Raseed then set off to investigate this tragedy, in the process meeting the novel's third protagonist, Zamia Badawi, the last of her band and gifted by God with lion-shape. Together, these three characters attempt to solve not only the mystery of the death of Miri's niece but also a greater mystery that threatens the political stability of Dhamsawaat.
I have also introduced an amazing new interest into my life. I somehow met this boy…would you believe — 8 years ago. Yes. 8 years. Funny thing is that we never actually met. We were introduced by friends and we were friended by each other on Facebook. We messaged each other back and forth for a while and then for some reason or another, we never met. He refriended me after 3 years or so about a month and a half ago. Things went from there. He asked to hang out, and we did. Finally. He’s really not my type. He’s an artist — who plays baseball in college. Go figure. There’s just something about him that makes me really believe he is different from anyone I have ever met though. He’s sweet, funny, artistic… and for some odd reason, he’s crazy about me.
(If you are serious about Korean cooking, you better get this soy sauce because I am using this sauce quite often.)
In the fall of 2008, I gave the yarn to my mom to start her second pair of socks and deleted it from my Ravelry stash.
First we went to the Register of Deeds to request a few extra copies of our marriage certificate. You have to show ID (like your driver’s license) to verify your current address, but if it isn’t up-to-date, you can bring in a utility bill and another form of ID. So I did. Once I presented all of my information, the clerk thanked me for reading their website, adding that no ever does that. And when I told her I requesting the copies as I was moving out of the country she said she “really hoped” I would come back to Wisconsin. Wow. And who says government workers aren’t friendly? ;)
I've given the blog a slight face lift. If you only read via a blog reader or RSS feed, click on over to see some of the new things I've added. I kept the background the same but changed the layout a bit. I also finally added "pages" to the top of the blog. Hooray!!
What can a monk tell you about the secret of life? And how does understanding impermanence and preparing for death expand upon the secret of life? Tonight’s conversation between Venerable Tsering Phunstok– a practicing Tibetan Buddhist monk residing in India– and artist Shannon Brunette will investigate Tibetan Buddhist perspectives on death and impermanence in modern life, as well as the life of the Tibetan monk as it relates to the most basic tenets of Buddhist practice and beliefs regarding death, karma and reincarnation through conversation. Questions will also be taken from the audience.
“She’s pregnant,” he mouthed.
The best-beloved Night!
What happens now? The winners of the BiBs are decided by judges, so the public have no further input. For the MAD awards, readers are invited to vote again to decide who should win in each category. If you would like to vote, click here.
That being said, it took us two long hours at the DMV to get his learner's permit.
But at the same time i'm like, okay there are like five billion gay men on the planet, were are they represented here? Youve got a whole thing full of lesbians and where are the gay men?!!? R u a homophone because i think if you really sallut the gaylbtpdq comunnity you need to reprezent the gay boyz STAT!!!
Will enter the age of harmony of humans and nature,
They still need the following (in US dollars):
Of course, the “choice” offered is not nearly so extreme as Hobbes’ choice, but is nevertheless a choice that is badly skewed by the costs attached to some options, then it does not improve choices.
Cookie dough as crust.
The Sabu to Nubra Trek is another beautiful touring destination for trekkers visiting Ladakh. The tour includes 10 days of fun filled trek including all the modern amenities required by modern people today. You need to climb up 3400 meters from the Sabu hill to Diskit. The Nubra valley is very famous for Bactarian camels, sand hills, Samstanling Monasteries, Khardung La Pass and Deskit. You get to see the beautiful regions of the Nubra Valley,the scenic beauty, the huge landscapes and the beautiful culture here is too good to resist. Undoubtedly one of the best place for trekkers in love with modern amenities.
“And the latter? — The ability to truly give, and not pull for myself, the ability to easily forgive the evil committed by others against me, the dedication of one’s life to the good of others, rather than to one’s own good…
(picture courtesy Peatworrier)
Recently, the kids & I participated in a video at the Down Syndrome Aim High Resource Center. We had so much fun & the end result is sweet & inspiring!!
I want to tell you two short stories today. They really have nothing to do with each other, except that the first story reminded me of the second. The second story is a from my own life, but the first is "borrowed" from another blogger. You should get at least a little chuckle from each. Both stories illustrate how we can trip ourselves up when the "Words Don't Fit the Picture!"
*An Art Creating station with Scratch boards
My first thought on all of this is that we need to start taxing the Indians more. While some of the Indians are poor and need our help others run huge Casinos that can't be taxed properly because they are under a treaty. We only have the power to charge them a special tax which is a start... While some Tribes need our help in surviving, others are taking advantage of the system and do not need all of this special treatment. Than my second thought is that I don't have enough information to make such an assumption. I am not a smart man outside of the workplace.
Interestingly enough these uncanny threats are all given reasonably rational explanations - very unlikely explanations but non-supernatural. There’s some delightful technobabble here.
You can walk out with this set up today ! Chocolate, Taupe and Seawater Rhino Plush covers are always in stock! Plus many other covers and we just Launch our New Custom Cover Line “Made In American” That’s right the good old USA.(New blog on MIA custom line to follow) Check out our Sactionals Overview video for some more great ideas!
Row 2: Dc dec over 2 dcs, across
She is searching for a hero to ride in
As a homeschooling mother writing about our experience, there is no way around discussing at least certain elements of our children. The thing about homeschooling is that it can be (if we choose to make it) highly customizable. People want to read my stories of why we do what we do the way we do it. They want to read about what curriculum worked or what didn't and why. Homeschooling parents need to know that the homeschooling lifestyle can be complicated. You can't just talk about things in a highly abstract manner, examples must be given.
In a document titled EU Citizenship and the Market published by the European Institute at UCL Jonathan Scheele writes “EU citizenship is in fact a rather different concept from classical national citizenship” and that it “especially relevant to those who make use of the Treaty provisions on the four freedoms to work across borders”. In the same document Dora Kostakopoulou states: “Peace and freedom are the underpinnings of our European identity made possible by the development and maturation of the European Union, including its unique model of citizenship…”
I was a work in progress.
MYTHICITY: *poor*
There are a plethora of blog posts on homemade gifts, creative gifts, and artisan gifts. This one doesn't fall into any of those categories. If you have some extra cash to spend (like somewhere in the neighborhood of $300) on a beer or spirits connoisseur, I have two gift recommendations. These are high end gifts, and packaged as so. I have personally tried both of these. While none of these are on my shopping list this year, they are something I will think about for future occasions.
In May, when I found out how sick I was, my grandpa called me and left a message telling me how much he loved me. I had this strong urge to save the message, which I did. I told friends and family that I couldn't loose gramps during this time of my life. I needed him and for him to know I was ok. I never got to tell him that. I am sure he knows. I remember calling him a week before he passed to get his advice on the drug Prednisone. He told me many a stories of his dealing with the drug. The last things my grandpa ever said to me speaks volumes to me because of humor and the depth in which he cared for me. He said that prednisone will make me fat but to not to worry cause he will love me anyway. What a wonderful man.....I miss you so much!
The early rag written by my favorite American composer Scott Joplin is dramatic and upbeat and fun to listen to, much like a sporting event wherein which a train wreck occurs.
Oh, hi!
I've been to the chambered tombs at Cairnholy on several occasion, so just a couple of pictures of them here. I bumped into an American chap, who spends a lot of time here, who pointed out a few cup and ring markings on Cairnholy I (below), and we had quite a natter about them. The markings are difficult to see in the pictures so here's just a basic shot of the cairn.
oh hi there! back for a bit.
Sue's own book 'A Clash Of Innocents' is absolutely fantastic, so if you haven't read it yet, I highly recommend it.
District Attorney Hayward Altman said he presented the more serious charges to the grand jury because he did not know exactly what he was dealing with. It is easier to reduce charges than add more, he said. And it seemed that a more serious crime had been committed.
The Chattahoochee River is not exactly a teeming, churning frightening body of water. It’s relatively placid as it works its way through the northern suburbs of Atlanta, passed the boom towns south of the metropolis like Columbus and Fort Benning, and then meanders along to merge with other water to empty "down yonder" into the Gulf of Mexico.
I also went to Mongolia on another missions trip, right after communism fell and saw the destruction of children caused by alcohol and cigarettes in a country that was too poor to feed its children. The most striking memory I have of that place was waiting in our comfortable bus as one of our missionaries headed into a market place to pick up food. Outside there were several homeless children, whom we later learned lived in the sewer system as it was warm down there. I watched a young boy, probably about 8 or 9, light up a cigarette, take a swig of vodka and look at me straight in the eye as he blew out the smoke. I'm sure my mouth dropped open in disbelief.
Hope to be back soon.
Results from Heart Monitoring
I want to know it all! Whatever it is, just let me know!
Early on, he gets the first of many temptations to simply meditate and study. He's as overwhelmed with the seeming near-futility of changing this sixty-year situation as most of us are; still, he listens and watches for his chances to apply the doctrines and disciplines he begins to practice.
Thankfully, this being the sharing caring digital age, I’m not about to make a fortune selling my tatty volume on e-bay as anyone interested in reading it can do so for free by downloading a PDF copy that some kind soul has uploaded for mass consumption.
Yesterday, I let her play with my second make up bag (the first one is off-limits) while I took these candid pictures.
oooh good news I got a message from a guy who used my voice in an old pc platformer game, he's finalising my character's battle cries (I had so much fun voicing that character, only reason being the director preferred my English accent over my American one YAY).
QUESTION...??
–SANDHILL CRANE, NW of Cochrane, meadow W of RR60, just NE of Twp Rd 282, Ron Kube,
Do you listen? Do you follow your heart and the signs that nature gives you? Do you?
East of Kansas is just a small shop with fun things. I love little family owned shops like this! And I try to support them as much as I can. The princess even used her own money to buy a Christmas ornament for her friend, grandma, her uncle and one for us.
M11: 10:28
Small mirror over night stands
I walked past this on the wall.
I wonder how many people sit in church during the sermon and make notes. Not about the sermon, but about their To Do List for the coming week. I wonder if forty percent are listening to the sermon and sixty percent are focused on what to do about Sunday lunch. Aren’t we just as distracted during our personal prayer time – if we remember to do some personal prayer time?
Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows: Part 2 - Wonderful! It was fantastic! Alan Rickman's performance was the best part!
It's still a cool word though, and though the noun might be difficult to fit into your writing, dextrous makes a great adjective.
There is a life of passion and excitement after this initial period of jadedness though, and it is very much what we make of it. For me, I realized I'd better start reaching out and doing something other than lying around and playing on my computer all day. There is an abundance of things out there for older people.
The whole reason I am writing this post is because I would like to enact a new law, nation-wide. This would encompass our neighbor to the north as well. Yes, like a North American law. And here it is:
London-bound thunder on the line,
There were a couple of “moments” playing with T in the garden, with a lot of focus needed on “squeeze my hand and let it out” – which she did, rather loudly!
Other notes: Planning and communication are key to this program. My co-facilitator and I stay in contact via email and in-person meetings. It is important to know what each other thinks about the books, the program, the participants, and any possible problems. Be sure to stay in touch and address them.
Morningside Co-President
3) I'm a politics geek.
I was suddenly flooded
5. Cultural crotches, crotches which convey significant cultural symbolism or display meaning from a distinctly ethnic perspective. Crotches used in spiritual and social ritual, crotches of distinct origins, exotic crotches, worldly crotches, any sort of crotch which conveys a sentiment of unique ethnic heritage.
Like an old friend who recently stopped by for a visit after ten years and corrected me five times when I used the word 'hotel' instead of 'pensione' when we talked about one of her trips to Medjugorie. "I stayed in a in a 'pensione,' Brenna, not a hotel." I did not correct her.
Why time didn't heal my wounds
And there were always a lot of orange hats in our car too. Because it was hunting season upstate, and you never knew if someone would mistake us for some deer when we went sledding the next morning.
Kingston, RI ?
I like it, and like even more that it was a total experiment for me. Sometimes you just have to get out of your comfort zone, even if it seems daunting... ;-)
Samuel Smith Old Brewery (Tadcaster) Samuel Smith's Yorkshire Stingo
(I'm not sure how this works for ladies... ;) )
Concerns regarding the ANC’s attempts to curtail freedom of media persist. The party periodically invokes the spectre of a media appeals tribunal, which would see statutory regulation of the media. Also of concern is ANC’s growing hold over the country’s public broadcaster, the South African Broadcasting Corporation.
I carried it around the store, gathered all that was on my list.
There is this phenomenon on Facebook where people can start a page called, oh, I don't know, "Mayonnaise is AWESOME!", and if your friend clicks "like" on that page it shows up in your Feed. "Megan likes 'Mayonnaise is AWESOME!'" And you even get to comment on her liking: "I know, right? Mayonnaise IS awesome!!!!!! LOLOLOLOL." So, naturally, being the mayo lover you are, you go right on over to that page and click "like" too, so all of your friends will know that you are an unapologetic aficionado of egg-n-oil emulsions.
· A bunch of pages written in XHTML that contain the written content of the book;
Today, the life insurance industry is clearly behind the times in the use of technology.
“I can’t argue with that.” Derrek said with a small sigh.
MPs even accused the police of playing in part in the country's high crime rate.
3) He traveled with an Indonesia passport.
I started writing my new novel a couple of nights ago. After almost a year of tweaking my finished novels, entering contests, critiquing and being critiqued, I wasn’t certain I’d ever be able to get back into writing again. But, according to Suzanne Francis, author of Heart of Hythea: “Writing is like riding a bike. When you fall off it hurts . . . No. Wait! I meant — you never forget how to do it!”
The kids made flow maps on "How to get ready for school", "How to plant a seed", "How to give a dog a bath", "How to make your bed", "How to make a peanut butter and jelly sandwich", and "How to make a gingerbread house". After the flow maps, each group presented the class. Next week we will turn their flow maps into writing.
We reached Lake Merced at about 6:00am in what was balmy conditions. It was spectacular seeing the surroundings and had never seen the area look better. The runners picked up their bib numbers and an ECO blanket and goodies. It was great to see a few runners that I knew such as Bill, Paul, Noe and Eduardo and was introduced to several other runners. We had a photo-op a couple of minutes afterwards. Then, a few minutes afterwards, we walked over to the start area roughly about 400-500 meters away.
“The goal is to not discourage short sales. If you tell a lender, once you approve a short sale you can never withdraw your approval,” no lender would ever agree to one, says Stan Wieg, a lobbyist with the California Association of Realtors, which is backing the bill.
(Remember: You don't need a Kindle to enjoy e-books. The Kindle app is free for computers and most smartphones. It downloads in seconds.)
big and powerful build-up that eventually fades out. It’s all very dramatic, somehow
Many of the strengths of quantitative Utilitarianism of Bentham are also seen in Mill’s work
“Okay, I’m with you so far. Either way, we’ve got a pissed off wizard. Why didn’t he just use his magic to steal the money he was owed, or thought he was owed?”
Men came and took those trees away.
Is this a legal question, a philosophical question, a historical question, or in what context, do you refer to the word 'belong'? For example; in law, possession is nine-tenths of the law. Please clarify your question.
The Trashsparkle Household have been having two weeks off work and school. There have been visits to cities, clothes shopping involving me spending Quite A Bit on new clothes FOR ME for a change - including this luvverly rockabillyesque little black cardi with Bloody Big Day Of The Dead Skulls on it
glittery love
I mean, we certainly fought, and continue to fight, at times. When she was just a toddler I bit her on the face, and just a couple of years ago I gashed her arm open with my nails (then felt extremely bad about it for weeks, long after it had healed), among hundreds of other small fights that resulted in less spectacular displays of physical violence. For a few years, when I was in my preteen to very early teenage years, we lost a lot of closeness, as I had definitely hit a new developmental stage, felt a lot older, and Emi was still a little kid. But once she reached the preteen stage, we regained that closeness once more.
Hope you are all well and happy xx
and long long long relaxing
The beta "Kindle for the Web" program works for just about any book in the U.S. Kindle Store, except for free public domain books, based on my entirely anecdotal and unscientific research.
Too often the Western attitude, which is perhaps driven or even drives marketing and entertainment, caters to the now attitude.
- I got a big compliment from my principal. She emailed a picture of my word wall out to the entire staff. It is nice to know that I am doing things right and that she feels they are worthy of sharing with others.
Readability, Modularity (Ceylon), Speed of compilation (Go, Zimbu), Suitable for large team (Scala), Meta-programmability and extensibility (Ceylon, Scala), Concise (Scala, Zimbu)
I have laughed at some of the humour that I come across...
Maybe the word histoplasmosis, on any other day, wouldn't be cause for celebration... but today, today I couldn't be happier to hear I had a fungal infection in my lungs. For whatever Histo was... it wasn't cancer.
I wanted to say……….
Every sleeping conscience woken,
Hoping every enjoyed the celebrations and wishing you a great 2012!
In fact, aside from the first chapter’s colour pages, the last chapter’s ONE colour page, the animated adaptations I mentioned, volume covers, and some side-material, this is the only piece of colour artwork the series has gotten despite the really high quality drawings Akamatsu has given us:
On 3 April 1986 IBM launched the first laptop with a commercial purpose, namely the IBM PC Convertible. This laptop is equipped with a 3.5 "floppy disk drive which is a standard device. The processor used is Intel 80c88, which is a CMOS version of Intel 8088, which operates at 4.77 MHz. In it there are also 256 KiB of RAM that can be enlarged to 512 KiB. With LCD display and weighing 13 pounds, the computer is equipped with a handle that makes it easier to carry. This laptop uses a battery as its power source.
After lunch we decided to explore the festival. We found:
I will be forever in awe at the variety, detail and beauty of God’s many creations. Some of the most obvious examples to many of us are the flowers that adorn virtually every land across the globe. While in Ireland, we took a short photo-tour of the gardens at the Muckross House in Killarney National Park. While the house was itself was very impressive, and has a storied past that included a visit by Queen Victoria, the gardens and arboretum at the premises are outstanding. I have no idea how many people are employed to maintain the grounds, but it must be a small army of very talented folks. This first slideshow shows some of the many plant species we photographed there. (If you mouse over the slideshow, you can control the movement from one image to the next.)
Now to the pencils:
So now I have to take the dreaded test and I can’t even have a bag of skittles to comfort me when I fail. This is what it must’ve felt like when that guy got kicked to his doom with Gerard Butler scraming, “This is Sparta!” in his face.
PS - I found (on t'internets, all by my very own self) the flights she couldn't get me back on so the full 14 days, an executive (ooh get us, how very posh) 4 bed villa with private pool and games room, a 7 seater people carrier plus insurance and the grand total was £6930, a grand cheaper than I was quoted just for flights.
Anyhow, I guess might as well get started from the beginning. I was just curious how it all came together at Oberlin. That's such a small scene there if anything, you guys and Liz Phair...
The new book, written by Penn Chan, someone we've all heard from once or twice in the PC repair forums, claimed it could make any PC run faster and smoother within a few hours, just by doing some simple maintenance on the PC. It was a bold claim and one that PC owners everywhere will perk up at hearing.
After I gave him the release he needed,
Through the courtesy of Rob Van Houser at Deloitte and the Ledes Oversight Committee, the meeting will take place at Deloitte's Washington, DC office: 555 12th St. N.W./Suite 500/Washington, DC 20004
Needless to say, I'm now entering my 2nd semester of the BFA Photography program with a lot less anxiety and embracing the creative challenges that come my way. I've been interning for a free-lance photographer, which has been a great experience for me because I always felt that I learned more in a hands-on environment. I started with an interest in conceptual photography, moved along to portraiture and photojournalism, tampered with an interest in graphic design, and have currently found a surprising interest in fashion photography. I'm lacking in my apprehension of fashion photography and I'm not exactly sure where to start, but it's something that I'd like to work on this semester. I like to believe that my diverse interests have not hindered my career in photography, but have proved positive in that they have pushed forward my individuation as an artist.
I enjoyed this film. It’s tongue and cheek response to horror and it’s laughs made the experience that much better. I enjoyed the explanations to the stereotypical characters and the order of death. It also gave winks at some popular horror classics. My only beef with this is the ending. People may disagree with me but it felt cheap. An easy way out of such a complex story. A build up to nothing if you ask me. However, I can ignore this minor detail considering I had a good time.
Here's what you need, sorry I forgot to take a pic.....
WE’RE GLAD TO HAVE YOU OUT HERE IN THE MIDDLE WEST
My copy of this record comes from a Zimbabwe pressing, and the album sleeve is pretty basic. I found the original cover on the net and posted both of them, for your amusement. Luckily the sound quality is nearly perfect for this very fine album.
Is it like this, are we like this?
What you must understand is this: Turkey and Israel are allies. Again, this is beyond the narrative here, and will be a subject of a blog post later on - suffice it for now for me to list some articles about this alliance: here, here and last but not least here.
dissolve in sleep.
In your family
On the other hand, TV Asahi’s “11 Nin mo Iru!” experienced a sudden boost in ratings at 11:00 pm, catapulting the drama up by 2.4% (now 09.5%).
This book looks so cute I had to bypass several others just so I can read it. It lives out to this cuteness until about halfway through, and then I thought - hmm, I could have survived not reading it as quickly as I did.
I’ve decided to embrace the same mentality I had when I first got into film photography: this is your hobby, so let there be failures and endless amounts of money spent on new film and sometimes good, sometimes bad. Because even if they don’t seem too special to everyone else (par my best friends who always steal them), they are my moments. And I love each 4×6 dearly.
Boston, MA
For those interested in writing professionally, and I can only speak to long-form fiction, my best bit of advice is always to slow down. Unpublished authors, in general, are unaware of the glacial pace at which the publishing industry moves, but I’ve learned that it moves that way for good reason. Although it’s nearly impossible to resist the urge to hurry, writers would be well-served to imitate that sluggish pace. In their understandable rush to make their dreams a reality, authors typically believe their work is much nearer an acceptable state of completion than it actually is. As a result, they start the querying and the submissions process prematurely and send out what is less than their best work, which, consequently, is rejected.
Divide the crumb mixture into the holes of your mini cheesecake pan (or muffin cups) then press evenly onto bottom of each hole of the pan. Bake crust in middle of oven for about 5 minutes and cool in a pan on a rack.
So while I'm sorting & shivering, trying to arrange for vast amounts of possessions, people & pets to be shipped across the sea, the man is sitting over there in Brisbane talking (daily!!!) of the heat & the balmy evenings. Every time I mention the wind or the cold - I get told exactly what temperature it is there, what the wind is & the relative humidity - the whole 9 yards. Yeah - real subtle!
Ty was confused. “Yah, I remember. What about it?”
Williams is of course, not a BNP member.
Posted by ZeroTolerance at 12:29 AM
As good as my mood was on Friday, my sinus infection got much worse on the week end, to the point that I had to resort to some (albeit pretty mild) pain killers. And I spent a lot of time under a towel with my head over a steaming bowl of water and baking soda.
AND . . .
But can’t we just tell men to “Man Up”?
I bought four of the size small covers, and I think they'd work better for pudgy apple-shaped babies, since the velcro closures practically overlapped on my long and lean little guy -- even though at 12 lbs. he was right in the "up to 14 lb" range for the size small. You'd certainly need a separate newborn cover if you wanted to cloth diaper a small baby. Overall they're decent covers, but I definitely didn't reach for them first and may only use them as back-up covers with future babies.
many coffees without sugar during the day (about 5-7)
And in just a few short weeks? Busy season will be over and our lives will go back to somewhat of a routine.
Evil Joy here with a post about mobile phones and the companies charging ridiculous rates to use them…while in a different country….to contact your psycho Evil Wife…..to keep her from being More Evil and More Psycho….
(2) Disciplinary Rule 325 (By failing to pay the Scottish FA, within three days of the above match, monies due under Rule 46(c)(1) of the Scottish FA’s Cup Competition Rules; being the Scottish FA’s levy on admission charges for the above match.)
Since it's not reversible I went with a plain pink I had sitting around (that photographs like it's lavender but I promise you it's pink). The quirks from the foot trouble are more evident on the back, but oh well. I machine-bound the entire thing - I'm getting better at it but I still need to work on getting a better look on the back part.
The "V" of Indian Vegetables
Where in the world have I been? Cooking? Yes. Blogging? No. We have been a little preoccupied with processing our most recent decision: We are moving back to California!
he would leave her a quarter,
08 Two Hearts (2:52)
The Joint Chiefs of Staff reportedly advised the President that significant reduction in U.S. force levels in Iraq – beyond recommendations made by General Petraeus and endorsed by the White House – are necessary to ensure that the military is able to respond to other threats. According to a Los Angeles Times report,“the Joint Chiefs in recent weeks have pressed concerns that the Iraq war has degraded the U.S. military’s ability to respond, if needed, to other threats, such as Iran. The chiefs are pushing for a significant decrease in troop levels once the current buildup comes to an end – perhaps to about half of the 20 combat brigades now in Iraq. Along with support units, that would lower the U.S. presence to fewer than 100,000 troops from the current 162,000.” (Los Angeles Times, 8/24/07)
doing penance for impetuousness
Another problem I have with Thing 2 is the effects. I don't completely hate CGI on principle - it can give us some really cool things to look at in a movie - but it did not work for me at all for Thing 2. When you're basing your prequel off of Thing 1, a movie that is known specifically for its awesome organic effects, and you go all CGI, it just doesn't feel the same. I miss the practical effects, okay? They look a heck of a lot better and are more convincing, plus they are just nasty, real and visceral and that's always fun for a horror fan. Thing 2 was all about somebody's body ripping apart and these weird tentacle things flying every whichaway. The ideas for the effects were very interesting and cool; I only wish they had gone with the practical approach to achieve them. I did like the two-headed thing, though. Props for that.
Have the current Pakatan councillors taken a 66.6% quorum census on whether the guidelines should be passed? If this handful of councilmen is PLACED by political cronies without the Rakyat’s 66.6% quorum vote via Local Council Elections that Pakatan has never kept word on, it is arguable that the ‘gudelines’ INCLUDING the UNELECTED/UNVOTED Klang Municipal Councillors are ILLEGAL and not approved by a 66.6% quorum majority of the voters rather than 1% MPs, this includes the unelected councillor cronies who draw salaries on taxpayer funds even though the Rakyat did not and probably would never vote for them. Amend all voting systems to one-man one vote!
JUSTIN: Where did you discover your lead actress, Tanna Frederick for IRENE IN TIME?
Me: An example of you “relative” treating of someone “nice?”
Wendy -68
I am self-employed but I am bucking conventional wisdom by currently trying to get into the private sector.
“No luck, General Devereaux,” said Acker in his high-pitched voice. “Whoever this rebel is, he’s keeping a low profile.”
"Well if it used to be that good then you must have given it a lot of love and attention"
In a few more days, I'll get up at 5:40. Sit in my chair. Then 5:30. Guess what I'll do? Sit in my chair, and maybe I'll write.
Concentrating themselves on the 1-stop long-haul market, with the 777, A380′s 787′s and A350′s on order, they will maintain a young, economical and reliable fleet offering them great competition against it’s European rivals. With a brand new airport in Doha, the connections that the airline will offer will make themselves much more appealing, perhaps even stealing some of the historically ‘only-direct’ travellers that choose convenience above all else.
Returning to Creative Dreams
Observant as they needle
NOT purchase tobacco from the shop onboard (if they have any of course!)
Presenter : Name a dangerous race?
Linda Augsberg from Make it Mine Magazine has a nice YouTube tutorial of stitches. Also quite a few modern samples of how to use embroidery today.
Masturbating with a magazine
She added: ‘All this contamination still sits in the ground, that could have been cleaned up 20 years ago, that could have prevented an aquifer from being destroyed, that could have prevented another community from coming down with disease, and we’ve done nothing.’
It means more than you'll ever know to read a good review, or some kind words about my stories. You have no idea how ridiculously happy that can make a humble indie author like me feel, so I can only hope that you'll continue to read and enjoy my work in the future.
* 1 to 2 tablespoons milk
Master manipulator, head bitch and grifter extraordinaire, former half term, half wit, half Governor of Alaska. She's not only fashionable, but has the audacity to preach abstinence after screwing the largest state in the country. Known to have taken money from VECO, found guilty of Abuse of Power by the legislature and gave $500 million dollars of state funds to her friends in Canada. Stated that Obama began his political career in "a terrorists living room" while forgetting to mention she started hers sipping wine in the living room of Bill Allen who has been convicted on multiple counts of felony bribery. First important act in office was to appoint over 100 friends from high school, church and political contributors to high level positions "without apparent regard to qualifications."
This is the pattern of God’s dealing with man all through history. Another example is Abraham as we read the account in Genesis 12:l. “Now the Lord had said unto Abram, Get thee out of thy country, and from thy kindred, and from thy father’s house, unto a land I will show thee.”
1 accomodations
Jack White: You Know That I Know
The fact is, for most of its history Social Security has been "pay as you go." But the baby boomers - the '60s generation, my generation - constitute a demographic bulge. It was realized decades ago that our retirement could strain system. So in 1977 payroll taxes were raised significantly for the specific purpose of creating a surplus that could be drawn on when time came. That's what's happening now: We are tapping the reserves set aside for this very purpose.
Dear Parent,
At the end of the year (or not, since I can keep adding on to it), I could have a scrapbook-style quilt of puffy memories.
The good news is that God does know who we all are and everything we’ve all ever thought or done. Jesus knows because He bore all our sin as He hung on the cross. And He loves us anyway. He always will.
It takes more than one , okay, more than three cups of coffee to make me feel like I am up and awake.
Joseph Harker gives us Reverie Sixteen: Nothing But a Pack of Cards, which offers us an involved process that’s a whole lot of fun. I have a labeling machine and now have a pack of cards with all sorts of possibilities. Go on over to read the whole.
When I first arrived at my apartment, I was sadly eager to lie in my bed and check in with friends and family back home (i.e. check Facebook and Twitter). I brought 2 outlet converters and a power strip. I proceeded to plug the power strip into the converter, and the converter into the wall. The outlet did not agree with me and reacted with a loud firework-like sound, some smoke and a few sparks. The lights went out as well as the electricity in the entire building. There wasn’t Wi-Fi to check my social media sites anyway.
Orlando Silveira - orchestrations 9, 10
Idinthakarai
Message: Sure ignore your Dad and go make a deal with the devil, it’s cool.
Painfully,painfully obvious.But a good place to start.Buy rechargeable batteries for obvious reasons.The Nickel Metal Hydride battery(NiMH) are better than rechargeable alkaline batteries.NiMHs can be charged thousands of times before they need to be disposed of or recycled (try Call2Recycle which has thousands of drop-off locations in the U.S. and Canada).If you are not going to recharge,then buy alkaline batteries.They maintain their power longer than NiMH batteries.NiMH’s are terrible if you don’t plan on recharging them.
Need some inspiration? Be sure to hop on over to our DT member’s blogs to see what fun they whipped up using these gorgeous shades of green and purple!
“Kazuka is your average high school girl with the exception of having an irregular personality. She wakes up one morning slightly later than usual to find a red thread attached to her finger…
1st in Series: B+
(If the deers had known, they'da nefur dared).
You don't want coffee or tea. You want sleep...blessed sleep...
"Hey Keisa, what do you want to do?"
As they say, third time’s the charm, as this is the third meeting between these two teams during the post-season, with Detroit knocking out Nashville in both 2004 and 2008. Last night was little brother’s turn to finally surpass big brother and how sweet it was.
Apropos Nothing: A Few Loose Ends
These are unlike any bathrooms you’ve every heard. They duel. Each bathroom projects a different composition. When in the hallway you hear both. When inside the bathroom, you only hear one side of the composition. Our composer, Micah, spent 2 weeks figuring this out and is wiring the entire system himself.
I will be emailing the winner shortly.You have 48 hours to respond. If i don't hear from you in 48 hours a new winner will be picked Random.org. Have a great day!
In a skillet put the pumpkin puree in medium heat and let absorb most of its liquids. After 5 minutes throw the sugar, raisins, semolina and spices and mix until they are all incorporated.
· If you could give Luke one piece of advice, what would it be?
In the film The Hurt Locker the idea that "War is a drug" is demonstrated throughout. There is no doubt a hormonal response we have to violence and certain addictive personalities are drawn to that experience, and some in a habitual manner. Some of these people, like the main character in The Hurt Locker, go into the military. Some others enact their violence on their families, on animals, their car horns, on the guy with 13 items in the express checkout lane at Stop and Shop...and others play video games. Of these possible outlets, video games are clearly the least harmful of them.
~Happy Reading Everyone!
Brazil’s finance minister, Guido Mantega, should have been doing a victory dance around the IMF last weekend rather than threatening further capital controls, it seems.
8. North through Letchworth State Park, then up Rt. 39 to Geneseo. Wait till the Genesee is at high water and run this one: the falls are awesome, the winding roads exciting. The run up 39 to Geneseo will take you out on glacial plateaus that look over miles of lowlands.
“Hmph, well I don’t want any of that,” I told her. The last thing I needed was to try to organize the Internet.
Say what you will about me, about my photos, about my back fat. I can take it — I’m strong, and getting stronger every day. But please don’t think that because I don’t (or you don’t) look like some fairy-tale version of a woman that I’m any less worthy of love and respect. Or that I shouldn’t be proud of my accomplishments — all 26.2 miles of them. Because beauty and health are not to be found in how small your waist is or in how fast you can run. Both of them are found in your heart.
Sprinkle some of the salt to bring out the liquid of the cooking onions.
It was a really amazing cookie on flavour but I missed the ball park with texture. I had too much butter and not enough flour so the dough spread a lot in the oven. I also didn't add enough eggs because the cookie broke really easily. For those reasons, I'm not going to post the recipe but I'll make sure I fix it up and post it early next week. I will however give you my toffee recipe cause it's really simple.
Well, it isn't quite over yet. Both Christmas Day and the day after--known as St. Stephen's Day by Catholics and Boxing Day by our British friends--were pretty exciting for Van Gogh and me.
Even though I am doing better today, the wounds and scares still remain, at least I proved stronger and so was able to break the cycle, for my children are now grown adults and were never experienced abuse. However I am sorry that my wife was exposed to my pain these many years.
Rule number one: Don’t draft a project in the first round. A first round pick should be a player that can be inserted in the starting lineup fairly quickly, if not in week one, at least by week six or so. When I say a “project”, I don’t mean someone who needs coaching in order to adjust to the system or to the professional game in general because all draft picks need coaching. I am talking about the player that has a multitude of raw talent, but is going to take years to play at an NFL level. First round draft picks should be NFL-ready now. That’s why they are so valuable.
Youtube.com Pre-show
Er... make that tonight.
*I’m not going into specifics here as I don’t want to give identity thieves or abusers a ‘how to’ guide.
She’s employed by her widowed mother’s “chic but financially embattled umbrella shop” where she meets Guy the evening before he leaves for two years of combat in Algeria. They make love. She discovers she is pregnant, and must choose between waiting for Guy or accepting a marriage offer from wealthy diamond merchant played by Marc Michel.
Even though red is the traditional color choice for Indian Weddings, many prefer to opt for pink instead, especially in Summer Weddings mainly due to its charm and the pretty look it evokes. An all pink Bridal Lehenga Choli or Bridal designer Saree, especially in pale shades of pink makes a bride look her prettiest. Usually pale pink Bridal outfits are adorned with silver embellishments such as silver sequins, bugle beads, zardosi, beads, zari embroidery, etc. Summer Wedding pink Bridal outfits usually come in light and flowing fabrics such chiffon, georgette, net, viscose, etc. When coupled with silver or pale golden finish Bridal Jewellery, the entire Bridal look is absolutely divine.
Of course, if those precautions are taken, and actually work, and no damage is done, then everyone will cry that it was all a big fuss over nothing, like they always do. So the scientists can’t win, really. But that’s just how it is.
“All that said, although I think the economics of this treaty are pretty terrible, on balance, the arguments favour Ireland’s signing up to it”
Origin and emergence
I've done a lot of this not-living the last 4 years. It takes a concerted effort to step out and make things happen again. Sometimes the steps are very small; baby steps to the door, baby steps to the car, etc.
The outcome of these violent crackdowns is often terrifying as people are
Many medical practitioners suggest some of the ways of dealing with the issue of maternal health hoping to attract pregnant mothers to visit hospitals; Use of mobile phones (SMS) to educate pregnant women, creation of buddy groups to talk to pregnant mothers, distribution of MAMA kits, discounting drugs meant for pregnant mothers among others, creation of boda boda groups to transport mothers t hospitals, increase of remuneration of practitioners to motivate them further in helping save lives
And of course the flowers are from "WOC" as well as the beautiful crystal stems! The swirls are from one of my old "Quickutz" dies and the snowflakes (which are kinda hidden...lol) are from my new "Martha Stewart" punch!
And I had one hysterical gal that loved my sense of humor and we laughed every time we spotted each other over 5 days.
This is my first “guest post”, and it is in honor of International Women’s Day or maybe at this point, “month” and the anticipation of positive changes for the mass collective, that will come to fruition sooner rather than L8R – so that I can see the look of pleasure on her face when she finally tastes one of my culinary delights later this year, okaaaaay?
I'll post the poster when it's done. I HAVE to stay home tonight. And sleep.
Zip Zap has everything that a gamer could want: scalable challenges, bonus items, addictive gameplay, amazingly detailed graphics, a PHENOMENAL soundtrack and simple controls. Not to mention it has multiplayer capabilities and the staff is beautiful. Friends can play together on the same device in Co-op or against each other in Versus mode. Openfeint is even allowing players to compare high scores and in-game achievements.
And then there is round 5… I like round 4 better still.
We're heading up to my grandparents tomorrow morning to spend Christmas with them and my aunt, uncle and cousins. Dad only has until Sunday off, so it will be a short trip. We haven't seen everyone since deer-hunting in November (not that long ago, actually :) but it'll be fun to see them again. We're opening presents tonight and having a neighbor lady over for supper and possibly going roller-skating as a family (the 4-H program is having a "Christmas party" w/ roller-skating) but I doubt there will be that many people there. It should be fun though.
Called to Serve. Prepared to Lead.
I hope your week is going well. Welcome to the next challenge here at FYI. We had some wonderful entries last challenge, and have been really inspired by your interpretations of the photo. We will be back on the 23rd to announce our Lovely Lotus for the last challenge.
Still panting (must give up those cigars), I soon found myself backed up to one of the huge supporting pillars. With the sweat pouring, and my ticker bouncing like a Bluebirds fan who's just heard the Swans have lost, I rested a while. Suddenly there came a hand on my shoulder, and a baritone voice intoned, slowly: "Don't turn round, I'm going to slip you something". Well, I tried to explain that, " . . . though a fairly liberal man I'm not . . ." but I was cut short by something being thrust into my jacket pocket. (Phew!) "Don't move for a couple of minutes", the voice continued. Move! by now I was rooted to the spot!
I had an absolutely wonderful weekend/beginning of the week.
I mean, if they would just continue to page 103 they would see that the princess uncovers a whole underground movement of garden gnomes with interdimensional capabilities, and they wouldn’t be able to put it down. Right?
Kleenex consumption aside, Rick did enjoy his birthday. A few hours before these photos were taken, we attended Emma's first dance recital, which is why she's wearing make-up. (The ear infection didn't hit until Monday.)
Vermont 6-Mar 17 9 4 0 4
I almost didn't write a post today (yes, today as in I'm typing this at 10:10 a.m. central time).
Me: “Sorry what?”
I used these darling little dies to create some cute critters and set them against a dry embossed background and some fun patterned paper. Along with a few Liquid Pearls, I completed the card with a spooky fence and spelled out exactly what I scream whenever I see a spider (though I suppose I might not if it were as sweet as this eight-legged little guy!) I hope you play along this week and thank you to the gang at PPA for inviting me to participate in such a fabulous challenge!
Thats it!
All in all, it was a really neat experience. All the staff we met were seriously enamored with the animals and wholly passionate about their jobs. I think our zoo does a great job of taking care of these animals, but I still think it's a fundamentally crummy situation.
So many blessings & love today. I hope all of your homes are filled with the spirit & the reason for the season.
The kids decided that they wanted to receive some mail of their own. I told them that in order to receive mail, they needed to write a letter to someone. So we wrote to their great grandma and grandpa. I let them pick the colors of paper and marker that they wanted to use. On one side they drew them a picture (Their "writing") and on the other side they dictated a letter for me to write to them.
My soul is bowed down;
It's funny, but you (or at least I) look back at your life and see the blessings and challenges that each year held: first full time job at 22, married at 24, baby #1 at 26, finished graduate degree at 28, baby #2 at 30, back surgery at 32. Thirty-four is starting off this way. Hopefully, I'll be able to look back and see that this wasn't the defining moment, even if it feels that way now.
watching a mirage over Swasey Ridge.
Lindt Touch of Sea Salt Dark Chocolate – I just opened this yesterday and it’s a good thing I decided to exhibit some type of self-control…
I'd like to introduce you to a Great book, by a Awesome group of authors! Its quite a long list of them actually! They are the ladies of The Indelibles
“The first post office in original Lowndes County was established in 1827 at the home of Daniel McCranie in present Cook County. This was on the Coffee Road. The Coffee Road was the main stagecoach route from the upper part of the state, and was also the mail route.”
When I plan a day of errands I always have a backup plan.
812920 Photofinishing
Mitch: But you need a denouement! Lots of dogs start their lives from an underprivileged place, but it’s the dogs who rise to the top, who have a compelling story to tell. Like that dog Uggi, from the movie, ‘The Artist.’ He was born into the streets, rejected by his first two owners, then rescued by an animal trainer, just before he was due to go to the pound. Then he was trained to perform, and he appeared in movies, like, ‘Water for Elephants,’ and ‘The Artist,’ and he earned a Palm Dog Award at Cannes, a ‘Pawscar’ from the American Humane Society, a special mention at the Prix Lumiere film awards–
I know someone up there must be listening. My mother and I are survivors. Through everything we’ve been through together, we are stronger than ever and we share a special bond – the type of bond created by a mother and daughter who have not only seen the light, but held each other in the dark.
Ohh…
Although, I can't say as I blame him.
Weight- 24 lbs 4 oz (70%)
Yogini: iPhone.
Cover-Up (Suspense - 1949) ... TCM ... 9:30 AM
Over the three days I am teaching this cool little project in the Card Corner each day!
The perfect blend of modern convenience and rustic tranquility. Of resort-style leisure and untainted peace of mind. The revolutionary Lumiventt technology, which draws in natural light and wind and sucks out stale and hot air, bringing fresh, cool air into each unit.
But the cheek still turned, even when it wasn’t hit.
The most time consuming part of this is unwrapping the kisses, which is actually a great job for little hands. (This still requires supervision unless you want it to become a job for little mouths as well).
NOTE: And the Spirit and the bride say, Come. And let him that heareth say, Come. And let him that is athirst come. And whosoever will, let him take the water of life freely. For I testify unto every man that heareth the words of the prophecy of this book, If any man shall add unto these things, God shall add unto him the plagues that are written in this book: And if any man shall take away from the words of the book of this prophecy, God shall take away his part out of the book of life, and out of the holy city, and from the things which are written in this book. He which testifieth these things saith, Surely I come quickly. Amen. Even so, come, Lord Jesus. The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you all. Amen.
07. Bible belt 4:45
4/26: Reading: Dyer, “White” (CV 823-838); Research Paper Due and final exam distributed
So he took her.
Jane’s Walk is a series of free neighbourhood walking tours that helps put people in touch with their environment and with each other, by bridging social and geographic gaps and creating a space for cities to discover themselves. Since its inception in 2007, Jane’s Walk has happened in cities across North America, and is growing internationally.
CALLER: So what makes it --
I have not done much cheating. Probably none the first six or seven weeks, meaning NOTHING other than the five Optifast products went into my mouth, food-wise. There have been two times at restaurants that I can think of that I ate a “real food” meal, but they were low-cal “fit fare” offerings, though I still shouldn’t have done it. There was also the “popcorn incident” involving maybe 2 cups of movie-theater popcorn. I think that was my first-ever cheat on the program, and I regretted it.
Gary Robert Haag, 36, Ossining, N.Y.
OH mercy! Sorry this is so late. I haven't had time to sit at my computer & type!
“That’s not fair.” I can’t tell you what joy this phrase brings to my life. Because I hear it. Often. From my kids. When they have to come in for dinner. When they can’t have a friend sleep over. When they have to stop their game to finish homework. When they have to make their bed (again) because it didn’t work the first time with the kicked-off sheet lying on the floor. When they don’t get their way. Then, life is not fair.
After the square, we went back to hotel to freshen up and off to dinner. This time seafood dinner at Moslem Restaurant (Huimin Fandian), Zhong Shan Lok Road, No. 325, Guangzhou T: 8130 3991 / 8130 4664. Or some website listed the address as No. 325, Zhongshanliu Road, Yuexiu District. Tel: 020-81303991.
‘I think the common denominator with us is our wheelchairs,’ she adds of her co-stars. ‘But it’s not about the wheelchair. It’s about our spirit, and how we just live life to the fullest.’
#6 1983 Dale Laverty EP Andress 300 Met. Hurd. 36.84
I have read about postponing ejaculation, and when I felt myself coming I stopped and clenched, waiting until the pleasure slid back down the hill. I’ve tried this with L (Wait, I’m trying to hold off. –I know you are….) But it never works; the pleasure is too intense to restrain.
“Be the change that you wish to see in the world.”
If Day 1 is any indication, spring break in Cancun is going to be a pretty memorable one. I was prepared for crowds and chaos at this time of the year. Instead, The Royal Beach Club at The Westin Spa and Resort in Cancun has been perfect. The beach is absolutely beautiful, our rooms are large and comfortable and the staff has been terrific. I've witnessed more than a few front desk employees sigh as our group of four tired, cranky kids walk into their hotel lobby. Here at the Westin, my children have been welcomed with open arms. During check-in the staff couldn't have been more accommodating and even moved our rooms when they realized they weren't next to each other.
1/4th cup sugar
Each week Green B.E.A.N. Delivery brings a bin-full of freshness to our front door. I really really love that we use their service. Coming home to a bin filled to the brim each Thursday is one of my favorite things. I never cease to become giddy when I unload our container and arrange everything in our fridge just so. There’s always so much color.
Indeed, the finance sector is not adding value but extracting rent. Much financial innovation was worse than ‘socially useless’, it actually harms the economy. This sector is built on tax avoidance: from 2002 to 2008, tax receipts from finance were just £193 billion, only 6.8 per cent of the total, half what manufacturing industry paid. Finance employs just a million people, 4 per cent of workers, no more than in 1991.
Knock. knock.
someone else I’m sure will throw in some extra.
How was everyone's weekend? We had quite a rain yesterday-almost all day and it was cold. It was a lazy day- and all I could think about was laying around in my pj's and watched PSYCH ( all 79 episodes of it). I did not watch all of it but I intend to.
1 betcha
Truth requires tact. You can be right all day long, but if your methods put off your hearers, your words will not penetrate their hearts, and your efforts will be futile. The challenge to Christians is to find a way to remain faithful to God’s eternal truth while speaking it in a way that keeps love at the center and is intelligible, even to a hostile world.
3 jar
Curried Lobster with Rice ~ lobster mixed with curry spices and butter, then fried, with coconut milk, cream, and lemon, then served with mixed pickles of chutney
"Shhh." Some subtle shift in her position told him to look down. The main body of the Axtli was gliding slowly past. Its spines all pointed forward or back, and Rel finally got a clear look at the creature within.
Bring two cups of milk to a boil in a medium sauce pan over medium heat (if you do it hotter, the milk might burn and that is a total bummer). While milk heats, whisk together the dry ingredients in a heat proof bowl. Slowly add 2/3 cup milk to the dry ingredients, whisking constantly to keep smooth. Add vanilla and egg and mix well. When milk is just boiling drizzle into the vanilla/egg/cornstarch mixture. Mix well and then return the whole thing to the saucepan and cook, stirring constantly, until the mixture thickens, about 3 minutes. Divide into six ramekins and chill.
Gerda K. Nelson
imperfect. Because we are humans, we make mistakes. This is precisely what is so refreshing and real about a phone conversation; the joy of that unexpected, extemporaneous comment gives us the most pleasure. Two people on the phone are two minds sharing thoughts, ideas, and feelings in real time.
I, for one, built a bridge. I now understand another piece of my puzzle. Not only have I been releasing weight but I have been releasing what has been weighing me down within.
the way.
this bar is going to attract patrons from all walks of life and from
BTW, Knight does not present a comprehensive list here, but his are fine, and recent additions to others already presented.
I also stopped by and visited the TierraCast ladies. Julie Young, Pam Arion, and I posed next to their fabulosa calaca, for which they have a wonderful name, but it escapes me... maybe it's the traditional Catarina? Anyway, as you may know, I love all things Day of the Dead, so I was so happy to hang out here.
3:00am: What's this class called again? Is it "web content management and authoring" or "web content authoring and management" or "web content management for content authors" or "web management for content authors"? Sh*t how am I going to teach this class if I don't even know what it's called.
The memories stop again as she questioned her actions.
Although foremost a musician/songwriter, Diterzi has a long-standing association with other strands of the arts. She’s composed for modern dance, film (2007’s Requiem For Billy The Kid) and has also soundtracked visual art exhibits. Her 2008 album ‘Tableau de Chasse’framed her stage shows subsequent to its release. But whatever the themes or chosen medium, Diterzi is about the music.
"98.6" by Keith
Mix cream, eggs. sugar, vanilla sugar and salt. Pour the mixture over the bread. Let it stand overnight to swell.
On his sweet and sour inaugural speech, we were reading President Noynoy as someone who would do what it takes to ferret out corruption and wrongdoings. But recently, we see him as the President who do what it takes to defend his officials who are close to his heart.
Notice, there is nothing in the definition about quality of story content. Hey Bart, your historical comedy-romance about the Black Plague may outsell J.K. Rowling and Stephen King combined, who knows. That's for the reader to decide. But if you get a 1-star review, then just deal with it. As long as what the reviewer complained about was lifeless characters, dull setting, and boring plot, you will be fine. If writing is your passion, you'll either adapt and make the necessary adjustments or decide that Black Plague comedy isn't that particular reviewer's cup of tea. Critics disagree all the time. Art is subjective, especially when people spend their hard earned money on it. But if the critics complain that your book is equivalent to a bad YouTube video shot on a cell phone in a dark room with unintelligible audio, you're in trouble.
Mini Chocolate Chips
Covers you and your family for reasonable expenses for medically necessary treatment such as ambulance services, medical surgical hospital expenses such x-ray, etc. It may help you to cover the 20% of medical payments which may not be covered under the PIP coverages’ described above.
2007-08 Topps Basketball
Till I hear you again?
And go I did. My meeting with the CISD chief was very short. “So, we need a teacher to teach Asian history to four second year sections, and Philippine history to one first year section. You will also be an adviser.”
Mike Fuller, USA WEB
My biggest concern during weather problems? That my electricity is gone, and no machine can make my coffee, toast my bread, cook my egg, warm my water, and keep my frozen goods frozen.
This campaign, Arshavin’s lethargic performances saw him go further down the pecking order and many Gooners asked for his head on a plate. Despite the fact that this move was considered as a “breath of fresh air” to many, I was a bit bewildered to know that Arsene Wenger left Arshavin go with a considerable chunk of this season left to play.
Vegan Options: Grilled Vegetable & Whole Grain Salad – Seasonal Vegetables and Mixed Greens with Barley, Spelt and a Basil vinaigrette
Sometimes not.
One of my latest acquisitions, found in Port Hope, Ontario, is a black painted wooden folk art horse, about a foot high and a foot long, beautifully hand-carved, standing on a base painted with the words “Souvenir de”.
heals the sick and afflicted
Glass, wood, and naked eye: the movie-house
1) The Rhetoric of Masculine Christianity Yet the most important issue is not that Piper’s view would be misunderstood. The absolute fundamental problem would be that it would be mistakenly taken as good news.
Breaking ground through virtual space,
Second, since 1789, the US Supreme Court has overturned over 150 laws passed by Congress. According to the GPO (Government Printing Office):
I'm sorry to break it to y'all, but God doesn't really give a shit about football.
As much as I enjoyed this episode, I will say that Red Arrow had some of the weirdest out of character lines I’ve ever heard him say. Perhaps it was because of such that I finally realized that he’s voiced by Crispin Freeman, which in turn makes me anticipate when Arrow gets abducted by Haruhi to relive the last days of summer. “Arrow-kun, denwa~~~”
Chickens are a good place to start. They are small, require a small investment and a quick turnaround. We started with layers we ordered from a hatchery and, boy, were those city postal workers surprised when the package came through. I built a brooder out of a 4×8 sheet of plywood saved after a home remodel job sitting on another sheet of plywood I got from my neighbor’s trash. Yeah, we didn’t fit in the suburbs. Please notice the heat lamp hanging from a scrap strip of pine board. Not the best idea but chickens seem to manage in spite of owner inexperience/foolishness/incompetence.
I attended my local NVS DA vegetable seminar last weekend (see Darren’s blog for all the details). This was the first weekend event the DA had put on and they’d lined up two excellent talks for us. The first was a year on the allotment from NVS national chairman Barry Newman and he pointed out some great tips that he had picked up from the showing side of the Society and applied them to his allotment growing to get better results for the kitchen table (this is the way the NVS willl attract new members I think as the show tips and disciplines can be translated to the garden/allotment with great results). The second talk was from the legendary Charlie Macey on cucumbers and tomatoes. What Charlie doesn’t know about these subjects isn’t worth knowing. I learnt that you can’t really grow cucumbers and tomatoes in the same greenhouse effectively as they like different conditions with cucumbers preferring the humid, steamy greenhouse conditions that are achieved in summer by keeping the doors and vents closed and regularly damping down. We also saw slides from Charlie’s tomato greenhouse were he was still getting a great crop off the 12th truss of the plant which was growing across the top of the greenhouse. This was some serious tomato growing but nothing that anyone with a greenhouse or polytunnel couldn’t achieve. I came away with plenty of notes and a plan to concentrate on cucumbers in the greenhouse this year (the family favourite) and grow my tomatoes in a bed alongside the greenhouse using 3 mini-greenhouses side by side as protection in the early part of the summer. My main tomato variety will be Goldstar (recommended at the seminar for both its excellent taste and show qualities) and the cucumber variety is Carmen (which all the family love eating and is the top show variety).
Jonah's Injuries - Punched, almost burned, shot in right shoulder, stabbed in right thigh
2 tablespoons vegetable oil
Apples to Apples
80. Anne of Green Gables L.M. Montgomery
I'm antsy. I have no idea what to do with myself. I guess I'll just sit around and fret, freak out, and flail. The calendar is filling with goodbye dates but I have little hope that adding immense sadness to the mix is going to make the final countdown time more bearable.
WnW Craze Nocturnal
Hattie doesn't want to move to a new town. She was very comfortable in her old home with her old friends, and relocating makes her feel insecure. She's already a timid girl and doesn't like that about herself - she wishes she could be more brave, say the things she wants to say, stick up for herself when it really matters. Coming to a new town gives her plenty of opportunities to test her wings and grow into the young woman she's supposed to be as she faces peer pressure and some real danger. In the end, she proves herself a heroine, as we knew she was all along.
Went out later in the evening after unpacking and sorting out some itineraries, and took some pictures while i walked around the hotel vicinity.
Friends, acquaintances and co-workers have sent me on trips, bought me presents and food, taken me out and sent me beautiful messages of support. I've been better lately at being the kind of person who does these things for others but I think, for longer than I cared to admit, I was too busy staring into my own navel - at least some of the time.
The plane was all set to board when we finally got to the gate, so there was no time to grab coffee. They serve Dunkin' Donuts coffee on JetBlue, but I figured I'd just wait until we got to Austin to get my fix since coffee from an airplane almost always tastes terrible regardless of who makes it. That was a mistake. My head was throbbing by the time we landed.
We get the last 2 weeks of summer,
The people of the world will never thank God. When something good happens to them they will say they are lucky.
This is my first attempt doing figurines with gumpaste. More than I would like to admit, it does get addictive. Espcially making those minute details. I particularly liked the teapot and candle. The characters were chosen by the birthday girl, I think. I thought it would be a wee bit odd if I were to put the characters on the cake without a theme. Thus I organised a picnic for them.
I think fasting is a beautiful discipline. It is one of my favorite disciplines in fact. It fits my personality and is a fantastic call to prayer for me; but there is a problem.
He appears to have a slightly pointy chin which his father seems to believe I have too.... I'm not sure I agree, however we shall soon see!
As you probably already know, they made a movie which I think was quite good and faithful to the book. However, if you want my opinion, the book is much better, as always.
has yet to find the article you mention in your book. It doesn't, and never
3. Party goers then get to choose from hundreds of glassybaby, and 10% of the night’s sales go back to the charity of your choice.
* Lime juice addition in the marination adds to soften the chicken.
Alrighty-So I got to start the whole dialing and talking to a machine process all over again and tried to think of a different category for my question in hopes of getting to talk to a different person this time. Ah..a much better person, one who listens and then responds. She was very helpful, reassured me that echo bills come across her desk all the time, and no they aren't in the thousands but in the hundreds of dollars. And that there was a surplus of several hundred in our account (because we hardly ever use any of our health benifits) so it is possible that they would apply that to it, and I could end up paying nothing. She also helped me find the cost estimator on their website. And there I was able to see that my test would cost $200 dollars. Whew did I heave a sigh of relief. Okay I had all the info, it would be reasonable to have this test done.
O my soul, bless God,
Red card
The girls proposed me to be in charge of the tea and treats!! this is very exciting for me too because I will be albe to share with you what I do, waht I love to do so much. There will be alfajores, cupcakes and more! I will do my best to make you feel at home between friends!
He added: ‘I believe one of the factors which led to that is that they were not of your community or religion.’
Now Playing: 'Death and All His Friends/The Escapist' by Coldplay
A desert is a dry, region of little rainfall, extreme temperatures, and sparse vegetation. The nearest town to us, which gets more moisture than we do, gets an official annual average moisture of 12.78 inches. To put this in perspective Tucson gets an average 11.59 inches of rain annually. Our extreme temperatures are not hot, but cold with wide swings daily. We have acreage and it naturally has bunch grass and a couple of scrub junipers.
Taking care of our hearts can be messy business. Most of us would rather avoid the process altogether, fearing that if we connect with our pain, it will shatter us. The truth is, burying our heads in the sand will only prolong the process. We will continue to experience a low-grade pain or depression for years to come.
The moon was masked, in all of its luster, by the dark clouds bringing benign rain. I always appreciated the moon, as it was the more elegant, more reasonable, more beautiful source of light that the primitive man had to live under. I wonder what went through the minds of our ancestors when clouds would cover it, as they’d roam around in darkness, the weakest creature without sight. I’m surprised we’ve even made it this far. That’s probably why people don’t like the rain. Maybe biology tells us that we should dislike rain because our lives are at a greater risk of dying, either hypothermia, predators, or flood, and now we just get depressed and complain because it’s inconvenient.
Lawson Wijesooriya is the current Executive Director of Blue Sky, mother of two young children, resident of the low-income East End in Richmond, and has a passionate attachment to helping at-risk urban youth. A Phi Beta Kappa Jefferson scholar at UVA, she has a heart for the inner city and a soul for the wilderness — the perfect job requirements for a program director whose job it is to get urban kids Outward Bound.
When you feel that the pain in your heart will be unending
I sometimes wonder if the Internet hasn't made us into an impatient, distracted, and easily amused populace. It reminds me of the scene in Batman Forever (with Val Kilmer) where the Riddler (played by Jim Carrey) invents a machine that connects a person's brain waves to the television in an all-encompassing, zombie-like experience.
It felt like the night was ours, that Paris belonged to us. The weather was clearing, the Eiffel Tower glowing bright across the Seine. We tried to take a picture but the night was still too dark around us and besides, the memory burned deeper than any photo could capture.
1) what's your book about?
Carter has really grown into being the BIG brother! He went from being the baby of the family to the middle child. NOT an easy transition and he is definitely still in transition, but I'm so proud of him. He loves Hope and Zak! He and Zak love to wrestle and "beat" on each other like brothers should. Hope is warming up to Carter and now asking him to help her with some things. This boy has a heart of gold! He is very kind and it has been really cool to watch him growing into his new role in our family.
Lewis Schaffer – Live at The Hive Brian Damage
Though I hurt and I feel pain in my heart
not eating makes her light and
"Do you know whereabouts Chris went to?"
Junsu was sent to the hospital secretly so reporters and the paparazzi are unaware of the situation and make fake news or make their fans worried. The managers called Jaejoong and Yoochun to come to hospital quickly.
We ordered the Fried Pickles which I LOVE. Normally it’s served with a side of spicy peanut sauce but I happen to like it best with their signature Wild n Sassy sauce which is almost like a citrus, habanero aioli, it’s tangy with a little bite but not hot and goes incredibly well with the pickles. The dill pickle spears are breaded then deep fried but I am giving you fair warning; when they come to the table they look harmless enough but do not bite into them right away, let them cool or cut them open and wait a moment otherwise you’re going to scald the inside of your mouth. Next came the Wedge salad with BBQ ranch dressing which is essentially ranch dressing blended with barbeque sauce that imparts a smokey sweetness to the salad dressing.
A sophisticated philosopher and a permanently rat-arsed songwriter, both geniuses in their own ways, a shame they will be mutually unintelligible.
A tiny incision is made in the abdomen and a slender, hollow, lighted instrument is inserted through it. This lets the doctor view the ovary more closely and to obtain a piece of tissue for microscopic examination. If the tumor appears large, a laparotomy is performed under general anesthesia.
Maybe I should have started with a lap loom.
Walking up to the lake, which is in another park with an entrance fee and paved paths, we pass by a cage of monkeys. There are signs saying beware of monkeys, but they don’t come out much in the cold season, so there’s a cage full of them to make sure you get your regulation monkey sighting. It’s everything I hate about zoos, too. Three macaques are housed in a concrete box with a wire front and roof, with one tree trunk for decoration. There’s not enough space. There’s nothing for them to do. Just bare prison walls.
Take care of yourself in the meantime.Peace.
For many communities who have experienced the Happy Times scenario, it may take years for the core community to reverse this type of division. Over time, as some move away and others see the AD for who they are things will improve.
- a green veggie, such as peas or spinach
Red's Rye Ale: Wow! Hello, hops! As soon as I cracked the cap off of this bottle and started pouring this sweet amber-brown liquid, the room smelled like grapefuit and flowers. I did something a bit different this time and drank the beer at room temperature, to see if the flavors were any more pronounced. This made the mouthfeel a bit more creamy, I think, and the flavors did seem a bit more "present", as suspected.
Don't you dare fucking call me on the phone on Sunday. I'm worshipping, and will angrily bitch you out, possibly making you cry.
Here are some pics of our day:
6. Go-Go Train (Livin' Blues) 4:58
Kathleen’s site is one that I especially admired when I first set up my own research data site. I particularly liked how her research data and blog fit so nicely under the same interface. Such a presentation seemed beyond me so I was content with keeping it simple and just making my research site and blog as consistent with each other as possible.
The artwork is good, but Mase seems to have a little trouble making his characters distinctive, or my eyes aren’t sharp enough or something. In one story I thought it was a Fujimoto flashback on how he became in ikigami messenger, but it turned out to be a completely different person. Also sometimes I think there are recurring characters from an earlier ikigami incident, but again, completely different people. They just look very similar.
And all that is awesome if you can keep it up…but I’m telling you last night I screwed up and listened to the wrong voice. The one that said….
“future tax cuts” which they will be deeply grateful
Anyway it looks like our Antipodean cousins might be experiencing a sting in their tails when they go to see the doc!
Bradley Education
Ms. Stevens was accused by prosecutors of lying to the FDA and concealing and falsifying documents related to an investigation by the U.S. agency. The federal judge refused to let a jury decide the case, saying that would risk a miscarriage of justice.
The book was narrated in third-person that focused on Hadley's whereabouts and thoughts. This was a bit of a letdown for me because with so many family issues and much emotion incorporated in the story, I was hoping for it to be in first-person of Hadley. But nonetheless, I got to learn a lot about Hadley, and even Oliver. Both turned out to be great characters and they made a sweet couple. I rooted for them all throughout the book.
I made this fabric collage using my Paternal Grandparents' (Peter and Jeannie Maxwell) wedding photo. They were married in Saltcoats, Scotland and immigrated to the USA a few years later. I tried to stay with soft ivory tones to allow the piece to have a vintage feel.
1) Open to US residents only (sorry folks)
The terms are used interchangeably, and almost always indicate an individual in jail for slave condition. The vast majority of said individuals were held under the reason, “busque amo” — awaiting the search for a new master, awaiting a pending sale, etc. Masters who used the jail for this purpose were required to provide food and clothing for the slave. Ecuador didn’t fully abolish slavery until 1852, and as you can see on your chart, in 1853 there are no afro-descendant entrants.
Today was my official last day of classes! What better way to end my college academic career than with presentations in the class “The Science of Happiness”. A happy bonus, the professor gave us extra credit for attending the last day of class. Happiness indeed!
2. Mixology Certification: Maybe it’s because I was 21, maybe it’s because birthdays are a downer, maybe it’s just because this episode proves I love these characters so much that I care whether or not they have fun at a bar; no matter why, Mixology really really got to me. I think we can all relate to letting someone we’re not interested in hit on us just because we really like talking about science fiction programs. Or is that just me and Abed? Plus, the drunken make out in the car pulled the nearly impossible feat of making me want Jeff and Britta to end up together. Clearly I hate romance.
Back to work today after a long weekend which helps my wee eating routine a fairly quick day one closer to the weekend!!
Lovers of crisp, classic white shirts will not be disappointed, thanks to Thomas Pink’s trademark White Shirt Bar. The bar features an extensive collection of white shirts, with various perennial styles to choose from as well as seasonal additions. A shirt menu and dedicated staff that help find the right shirt for the right customer complete this novel service.
"Lucky little break from you're tiny friend....COME ON MOD MOON!
In some ways Nonie's fashion sense reminded me of Viola in Viola in Reel Life by Adriana Trigiani(For some reason I haven't reviewed the sequel, which is really odd because I enjoyed it, but I think I read it when life was being very life-y. At some point I'll try to review online, rather than just in my head).
Building act XXVII of 1839 and act XX of 1852 were introduced to obviate the difficulties to particular cities of Bombay and madras.
“If you’re unhappy about something, we’ll listen to you and put it into the policy committee at Number 10”
In the sixth image I enhanced the photo by playing with the contrast and brightness. The picture appears lighter and a lot more clearer than the original. I revised the file name as ZakeyaMurphys Peedy Brightness and Contrast
After power off ALWAYS bring the set back to the aerial
Having escaped The Weeping Angels in the catacombs, The Doctor and crew find themselves pursued through the wreckage of The Byzantium. But The Angels are soon to be the least of their worries.
For my more wonky readers: what I've noted above is just the start. There's much more to object to in the new law--see this long blog post from Gillian Spraggs of Action on Authors' Rights for a detailed summary.
So where’s the silver lining in all this if you are a New Orleans Saints fan? My opinion: forget about this season and let everything fall apart. Go 2-14 and get yourself a Top Three draft pick.
Aaron is still playing mama to the 2 goat twins. Their mother isn't giving milk so 3 times a say, Aaron fills the baby bottles and feeds the pair. They follow him around like pets.
Your little sister still seems to be doing well inside of me. She is a mover and a shaker and during the non-stress tests she acts just like she should. Her heart shows accelerations when she moves around and there are no signs of distress. I did talk to my doc yesterday though and told him that I fully realize that NSTs are a false sense of security because cord accidents don’t really give warnings and even though I go in on a weekly basis, bad things can still happen. But, the good ole doc continues to be confident in your sister making a safe arrival here. I am trying not to think about my 35th week which is coming up pretty quickly since that is the week we lost you. And I’m trying not to be paranoid because my doc will be on vacation next week which is a month before your sister will come here…and he was on vacation when we lost you… month before you were due. So, call me paranoid. Call me superstitious. But it is what it is and I’m trying my best to just go with it.
Here are some simple supplies she utilized:
This is a very exciting week because the new members of the Design Team are making their debut. Of course it is a motive to celebrate so keep your eyes open!!!
As a measure of respect for Martin’s financial support and faith in a relatively unknown writer, Bukowski published almost all of his subsequent major works with Black Sparrow Press. As an avid supporter of the small independent presses, however, he continued to submit poems and short stories to innumerable small publications throughout his career.
No, not with artillery; with my Nikkor 105mm micro lens (only Nikon calls it a micro – everyone else calls them a macro).
all dry soft hair and bare breasts,
The translation sometimes refers to this as “gorge.” The idea that I take away from this is the abyssal depths, and the dangerous aspect of water, which can be escaped, but takes careful action in order to do so.
every once in a while
All of this flies in the face of the story we are typically given concerning gay rights. The normal narrative one hears when gay rights are discussed in the media or academic discussions is as a group gays are a powerless minority being oppressed by an antagonistic majority. Lately one hears about bullying in schools, but the same narrative pop-ups during gay marriage debates and discussions of adoption.
Edmondson: It’s our stock and trade.
I also ended up starting the story earlier and carrying it through longer in time than I had originally intended, which we hoped would give young readers as much historical context as possible.
The fee requirement under § 1.17(p) for submitting an IDS is proposed to be eliminated. Under the proposed rules, an applicant wishing to submit an IDS after a first Office action on the merits and before the mailing date of a notice of allowability or a notice of allowance under § 1.311 could only do so if applicant meets the certification requirements under § 1.97(e)(1) (that the information was discovered as a result of being cited by a foreign patent office in a counterpart application and is being submitted to the Office within three months of its citation by the foreign patent office), or applicant complies with applicable additional disclosure requirements.
The Captain was perfect with his past and what were his faults. The surprise of who he was in the war made sense and gave him depth to his character.
My ones are:
One of my friends Sarah Sinaguglia (not the one with the birthday) is a lovely lady who is very crafty and puts the rest of us to shame with the amount of crafting and homemaking she does has just written her very first crochet book. She was contacted by the publishers after one of her patterns was included in Mollie Makes.
7. I waste too much time blogging when I should be working.
with this wound anymore.
Read to your child everyday. It exposes him/her to the letters, words, and a great model. Let your child choose books out of the library or bookstore, let them "read" to you, point out letters, sounds, and words as you go.
For today my next goal to focus on is obtaining my 5% which is 11.7 pounds.
More time has passed and he has been in my home on two different occasions. Last week, we kissed and I felt no spark. None of the passion that has always flowed between us was present on this occasion. I took note of this, thinking that it reinforced my decision weeks prior.
This is what the best brand positionings do too. As an example, when Movement helped Time Out define a new brand positioning, we made it very clear that this had to be not just a marketing initiative. It needed the full commitment of the staff and the business at the most senior level, becoming the guide for developing the brand content in all its manifestations, including its NPD. ’Know more, do more’ on the cover of the magazine is the most visible expression of a unique brand benefit that Movement identified for the brand and which has spread throughout the business.
mat-karma-kṛn mat-paramo
Every so often a trainee enters the academy who really stands out from the rest.
This old honky tonk’s become my home away from home
Open up GPG Keychain Access from Applications:
ABV: 8%
I hope you all have a great week and have a Halleighleeeuuuur breakfast for yourself too!!
I would like to make a chiptune MIDI synthesizer with it, but I thought it was a good start to play existing tunes.
Next up: the beginnings of a story about an old man who has to give up his allotment. Not very thrilling, you may mistakenly think - believe me, that story will plumb the darkest depths of the human heart: full of drama, tragedy and pathos, it will leave you feeling wrung out, such will be its power. (If I ever finish it.)
It turns out, there was as much hijinks (I love triple dot words!) in the Courts of the City of New Orleans as in the Criminal or Traffic Courts. This is the work of Laura and Howard Russell. Google HR Properties if you want to see how lousy landlords operate in the Crescent City.
You can also switch up the batter itself. Why not try chops almonds instead of walnuts and add 1/4 tsp of pure almond extract to the batter? Or chopped pecans and a teaspoon of ground cinnamon...so many ideas !
I had accepted my fate and took the ride up the street to the jail. They took all my personal belongings and put me into a holding room which, at the time, was populated with 4 women. I checked the clock and it was about 11:00. I asked the ladies in there several questions about the process. I was very unfamiliar with what was going to happen. They were very helpful. At this point I am thinking that I would be in there no more than 2 or 3 hours. I am honestly still contemplating finishing up my shopping trip today. But time ticked and ticked and ticked. And although I was continually asking for a phone call, they wouldn't give me one until they booked me.
What are some of his favorite/not-so-favorite things?
Did I mention that I have kids?
These Easter holidays have been characterised by a lack of childcare. I’ve filled the gaps with uneasy solutions, whole days with less loved adults. I’m grateful to these less loved adults but also to our school friends who have provided answers to the sheer boredom of these arrangements…of course I’ll drive over and take him swimming…don’t worry it’s only an hour out of our way….my child would love to see Tempest.
So sit back and relax, and read the reviews!
I would like to be next to you,
We served this alongside lemon thyme bars that Kathy created. Wow, lots of lemon at that meal. It was bliss!
-Ignores last IB50 that clearly stated calls not made /received due to self harm suicide risk due to distress/pressure of calls.
3) collaboration between countries (which offers a choice for the leader).
JPG is a Lossy File Format. What this means is that each time you save a jpg, its compression routine throws out 'extraneous' data in order to achieve the smallest possible file size. If you save the image several times, even without making any changes, the image can degrade visibly, especially if you save it at a higher compression rate (low quality). Get around this by:
But wait, that's just the tip of the iceberg. So many of things are going on, going wrong right now, it's almost just a perfect storm of shit. Just off the top of my head...
I feel about like this squirrel! We've just come through a busy month, and another one is coming up. It's time to take a blogging break for a couple of weeks. Wes and I are taking a personal break this week, and I have a Mother/Daughter Brunch coming up next Saturday, the 12th. I've been so busy with other events that I have only planned the brunch. I don't have any decorations made or bought and my thoughts are still muddled on things like favors and door prizes and such. I'm beginning to get that terrified feeling that comes when a deadline is looming and I don't feel prepared for it!
From the movie Eraser, "Nobody fucks with the Unions"
Over the three days I had a great deal of discussion about the idea of an association, guild or some kind of body for quality self-publishing services in the UK. That will only ever happen if the leading services in the UK come together and don't see themselves as competitors, but rather custodians of a new breed of self-publishing delivers quality and distribution.
The reference to “one side at one of the foci of the elliptical orbits” should have waved Bob off from swallowing Fr. Coyne’s erroneous claim that epicycles had anything to do with Fr. Olivieri’s argument. As it stands, the case laid out by the Commissary General of the Holy Office is perfectly cogent—an ellipse has two foci and therefore, if the sun sits at one of the two foci of elliptical orbits around it, it can't be in the very center of the solar system, let alone the whole universe as Copernicus and Galileo believed.
I loved that book;
Now, to go back to yourself for a minute. Try to think of the little things that make you happy, and do one of them every day. It wouldn’t hurt to write these things down either. On rough days when you don’t feel like doing anything, use it as a go-to guide to pull yourself out of your funk. We all lead busy lives- between work, family, running a home, errands, etc. It is easy to coast from week to week without taking “me” time. We need to recognize that we are worth our own time, and it is always a worthwhile investment. So, have at it. Get started on your book of awesome. Make your day by making someone elses. I promise, you won’t be disappointed.
I picked up this little dresser at Deseret Industries (Utah’s version of Goodwill) during the summer. Prices at DI are a little erratic, but in this instance, it was a good thing! At $30, it took me about 0.5 seconds to decide this one was coming home with me.
Write an un-complicated pattern with the kick and rename audio 1 to "Kick".
The RCMP, CBSA and CSIS have all sent officers to Southeast Asia to try to stop human smuggling vessels destined for Canada. Last month, Thai immigration police arrested an alleged migrant smuggler named Nadesan Jeeyananthan, also known as German Babu, a dual citizen of Sri Lanka and Germany. He was taken into custody in Bangkok. Canadian and Thai officials allege he was involved in the voyage of the Sun Sea.
Hanskin is one of the most reputable BB cream brands from Korea, so when I had the chance, I picked up the Super Snail BB Cream. Having had a good experience with snail skincare, I was curious to try a snail makeup product.
Also revealed was a email sent to consultant John Haggerty to two top aides, Kevin Sheekey and Patricia E. Harris, that an triggered Election Day payment to Haggerty through the Interdependence Party. The message that Haggerty sent in the email has also raised serious questions. Haggerty wrote " You also wanted to ‘wash in’ a $100K contribution on top of the cost of the operation."
Our next big sale is on Wednesday the 28th of March! Want to win $50 spending money for it? Here's how...
OR…just as we are about to completely blow up and let go of all that’s been stored inside us, we stop. We push those feelings right back down again. We rationalize that now is not the time or place to “let it rip.” And so the wall where we place our injustices and negativity continues to grow. We even manifest this wall in our physical bodies. As we shut off and shut down our emotions, the energy of them becomes trapped inside the body. This energy will exhibit as headaches, migraines, muscle aches and pains, liver problems, depression, lack of get up and go, and suppressed immune systems.
So jump over to the TICKLED PINK BLOG and check out the fabulous projects by the other Pinkettes. They have out-done themselves :). And ...
The card in the magazine used fabric, but I decided to try a similar card with paper. I used a variety of background papers which was great for using up all those scrap! I have never tried doodling or using my own handwriting on a card, but I am quite pleased with the results.
Short of having an actual website, there isn't much in terms of structuring and organizing this page as anything other than a blog with seemingly random album reviews.
Itching all over the body can be caused by something as simple as bathing too often, which removes the skin’s natural oils and may make the skin too dry and scaly.
It’s the hot season in Bamako. How hot is it? When you turn on the cold water tap, you get hot water. That’s how hot it is.
Just like the last one, I'm kind of biting my nails as I write this announcement - I'm hoping there will be a group of you cool people to hang out with in Kuala Lumpur. I know the food is amazing in your city, so I'm excited to meet you guys and make friends with you at the workshop! :D The last workshop sold out in less than a week, so do get in early to get your place and also take advantage of the early bird rate we have!
Until last Monday, after three miserable days, I finally went to the doctor. The doctor sent me to the hospital. The hospital admitted me.
It may have been bright and sunny,
10. Spend more time with optimistic people.
"Oh, I'm waiting for someone," she said with a wave of her hand. "Thanks though." She gave a quick, polite smile as the canyonous winter citywind picked up again, chilling her teeth.
It's like Battles is stirring up a war between man, animal, and machine...gathering all of the elements, giving them a good wind-up, and releasing them into the arena to duke it out. Who will come out on top? How will it all end? Does man overcome the machine? Does animal outlast man? Does it even matter..?
Because the thing is, I don't want to be an "adult", whatever the fuck that means. I finally realized that in one of my recent breakdowns (I very rarely meltdown, normally, but in the last couple of months, I've been making a habit of it.) that all I want to do is to be 15 or 16 again (despite the fact I had no clue who I was at those ages, and wasn't necessarily all that happy), and be able to just *be* without all of the pressure. The expectation that I should be moving on to *more*.
Rappin' Black in A White World
The guests signed the inside of this bible for Connor. The sign in table was complete with owl bookmarks and cigars for the guys.
1/2 cup (60 g) chopped pecans or walnuts
#139 sunshine
(Yes, don't worry, I am joking).
We now come to another reason I love the 70s. In the 70s there was never not a reason to have cocktails; pre-dinner cocktails, after dinner cocktails, just got up in the morning cocktails, ‘it must be five minutes since we had cocktails’ cocktails, at any given moment in the 70s the cocktail shaker could be miraculously produced from nowhere and any variety of alcoholic beverages could be shaken about. I actually believe that there is a law somewhere that states you can not be in charge of a cocktail shaker unless the cuffs of your trousers measure in excess of 12inches. In testament to this phenomenon, before the R.V. even fully comes to a halt, Frank’s out of his luxuriously upholstered driving seat and mixing Martinis. Respect, Mr. S. Now, while I may admire the ‘anytime, any place, anywhere’ spirit, it is partly this behaviour, and ‘Hot Lips’ Houlihan’s inability to keep her ‘hot lips’ shut, that’s about to cause all manner Satan related problems that they probably could have done without on their lovely, glamorous holidays.
Review time...
1/2 cup tapioca flour
(She may also be my new drag role-model)
To make it more interesting for me the movie had the Fonz in it, in fact there is the suggestion that Henry Winkler's turn on happy days had a alot to do with his casting in this tribute to urban American 50's youth culture.
group your painted twigs (now glistening vines) as you desire and hold them tightly bunched together
I got in 5-6 hours of traveling around the city, but in my head when I factor in the amount of time sitting on a train against walking the streets, I’d say I got in about 1.5 hours of walk time. But I’m ok with that! There’s a lot more to be had:) AND I took the stairs since they were faster than the escalators every single time.
That got me to thinking....
We love to do something different for each market we participate in.
RhinoTuff OD4000 Review
Below is a transcript of the texting between M and I:
I'll have to get back to you on this one.
Martin Blackie, Juan's seventysomething uncle, a second-generation Boer whose mother was among the first batch of settlers and whose father was detained in a concentration camp during the Anglo-Boer war, was honorary vice-consul of the Boer descendants in Chubut for 20 years, a position he held with much pride, but with the decline of an authentic Boer community there was no longer need for a consul and his position fell away last year. His children also speak little Afrikaans.
Prepare salad while steaks are cooking.
Make the pizza dough as you normally would - or use the stuff you bought at the store - and let it go through its first rise as needed.
This makes crime subjective and gives other ethnic groups legal power over “White” people. Further, guilt is determined a priori and not in court.
This storm was a big inconvenience to many, but our hearts go out to people caught in flood zones and have to rebuild after this storm passes.
I’ve heard that from day one in French schools students are taught that they’re not good enough. They colored outside the lines, they misspelled the word 'immatriculation' - whatever the teacher can criticize, he or she will without hesitation. In my opinion, this explains a lot about the thanklessness in the office.
DO YOU UNDERSTAND? YES or NO?! AGAIN WITH THE CAPITALS ... ? Seriously, you are an un-ethical individual, I'm really sorry that I ever meet you, I look forward to seeing/reading how many other people you've offended or abused.
I didn’t realize that I was so spiritually hungry that I was starving! Thanks be to God in giving me the hunger for the Word. In developing the Holy Spirit within me has transformed my soul. I truly am a blessed man – and I look at life with a different set of eyes. I have a different outlook on life – and it’s going great.
1-800-999-9999
Thank you for having endless articles on one of my favorite subjects. And thank you for giving me multiple answers to the question I asked last night. (really it had been in my head all week)
I was surfing the net looking at beer related stuff today when I came across, the West Brewery website. On it they have a video which kinda cracked me up.
Is it too much to ask as you step away to the ice box for another ice pack. To step back a minute before you put you hand on the worn out handle and ask Why? Why am I always getting injured?
To read a bit more about this amazing place, and to see where we've been hanging out all week, click here (scroll to the bottom to start from the beginning).
The highlight of those nights was stopping at a truck stop in the middle of the night where her dad would spend a little of the offering basket on two slices of pie and a couple of Cokes. Nothing ever felt so special as a middle of the night slice of pie with her dad. And nothing could stop the writing pouring out of her.
For better or worse, that didn’t work out and here I am.
**He typically is very sweet to Beckham but since he can't throw him off of him, he complains a lot about Beckham crawling all over him. I told him to stop whining, that Beckham was just trying to play and doesn't mean to hurt him and he respond (rather pissy-like) "well... it feels wike there's a thorn in his belly button... you should wet him crawl on you!"
Woke up at the butt crack of dawn aka 6:30, and felt quite refreshed! Breakfast consisted of manzanas (apples) and platanos (bananas) in yogur (I bet you can’t guess what that one is) with this oatmeal type drink in a coffee cup. Es bueno! Finished my homework in the taxi on the way to school (some things never do change) and for the first time in my life was 10 minutes early to class! Class was great again, but also like information overload! After the break we were playing a game with all the new phrases I learned and I was forgetting simple things because my brain felt like it was going to explode! I hope it gets better! Went to dinner with a bunch of the other students at this vegetarian restaurant, where apparently all the intellect slash tree huggers meet and by intellects yes I mean I saw lots of dreads and chacos, however sadly there were no subarus! :)
(ii) Just 3 months ago, on the 3rd of January, 2012 Dr. Kardam issued an absolutely opposite order in an appeal filed by Sai Vinod. He has blogged about the entire application over here. In that decision, Dr. Kardam accepted Vinod’s argument that the CPIO’s order was untenable since the CIC had ruled in the case of R.S. Mishra v. CPIO, Supreme Court of India that the RTI Act would over-rule all existing procedures to request information from govt. offices. That order of the CIC, which is available over here, was authored by Shailesh Gandhi who has given an extraordinarily detailed 8 pages order on why the RTI Act would over-rule existing mechanisms. The latest order of the CIC, in the case of V.K. Malik v. CPIO, Tiz Hazari Court, which has been quoted by Dr. Kardam in his reply to our appeal, is available over here. This order which has been authored by Annapurana Dixit is a grand total of 3 paragraphs (not pages) and applies only to cases where an applicant requests for certified copies. This order does not apply to mere photocopies. Unlike a mere photocopy, a certified copy has to be checked by an officer for its accuracy since certified copies are accepted as evidence in courts of law. Mere photocopies of documents are not accepted as evidence by themselves. We asked for only photocopies and not certified copies and hence the decision cited by Dr. Kardam is inapplicable to our request for information.
Double double
To fight the horde, singing and crying: Valhalla, I am coming!
On the one hand, her efforts helped me to feel a little better, but on the other hand, when I, a grown man have become sick enough that a Dora blanket makes me feel better, it can make me feel like a complete wiener.
by Mrs. John Sherwood (author of “A Transplanted Rose”)
Because however lovely it is living in and around Bath, being able to shop in Wells, pop over to Wookey Hole or Glastonbury, to be able to fly over the Welsh mountains and drive through two or three areas of outstanding natural beauty on the way to work, there is something about London.
Let your imagination go crazy. If you had access to all the resources you needed, what would your million dollar idea be? Just remember, alot of the advances in science came about from writers ‘crazy’ ideas and asking “what if?”
When it comes to finding out how prosperous or how well-known the item is there is certainly seriously merely one standards-how well manages to do it market? That is really the idea of your capitalistic process that we’re in. In the event the merchandise seriously isn’t well-known doesn’t necessarily market. Case the way in which our body operates. In the event the technique is excellent and it is inexpensive and there is a dependence on it-it’ll be well-known.
I've come to believe that the Hall of Fame should be a place for players who had a great peak AND a great career, the rarest of combinations. But I must admit that I HAVE sometimes thought that if you were a truly great player for an extended period of time -- say three to five seasons -- maybe you belong in the Hall of Fame no matter how the rest of your career turned out. I don't know if that's true, but I think it's worth discussing. The Hall of Fame would certainly not lose prestige or honor with Don Mattingly in it.
When I was growing up I thought that gift cards were lazy and stale, but now I realize that it might be the only sure win. It’s not cold and thoughtless the way cash is, and at the same time, leaves it open for the recipient to find something that they might actually want. There is still some thought involved, since you had to have thought of a store that they would actually like. As a last resort, always go with the cinema gift card, which pretty much says “I don’t know anything about you, but cash just seems too impersonal, certainly there will be a film of some kind you might enjoy someday”.
Kim says South Korean forces are monitoring the North’s military but he cannot elaborate.
All of this might seem hard to believe. How could such selection operate over a time span of less than two centuries? Yet that is what the data tell us. Neither of these Tay Sach’s mutations is present in France. They must have gone from zero to their current high prevalence in less than ten generations.
Social Media is one of those terms that everyone may immediately assume they can define. In our book, Be a Person: the Social Media Operating Manual for Enterprises, we take a stab at a definition.
Also, via that site's Google map of my area, I saw something that I'm shocked I hadn't noticed before. I live fairly close to Houston's old City Tubercular Hospital. Online searches reveal no details. This bears closer examination.
The Forest City Ratner monopoly hasn’t consented to be regulated by the government in exchange for its special [monopoly] status. For all intents and purposes it is the reverse. The government doesn’t regulate Forest City Ratner; instead Forest City Ratner has been regulating the government. To the extent that Forest City Ratner’s real estate industry development activities ought to have been subject to time-tested and carefully evolved regulations normally applicable to other participants in the industry, like zoning and review processes such as the City Charter’s ULURP (“Uniform Land Use Review Procedure”) or SEQRA (the “State Environmental Review Act”), Forest City Ratner used its political capturing of the state’s Urban Development Corporation (aka and dba: “The Empire State Development Corporation”) in order regulate government and effectively avoid any meaningful application of these or similar restraints as well as the public protection that was thereby intended.
Me: "You wouldn't do that, it would be a waste of good lox! I would probably grab it off your plate and just eat it myself then."
That was my weekend. How was yours?
I wrote about Eddie's early in my wanderings, and I'm happy to report that my love of his food has stood the test of time. If you're looking for a quirky date that won't knock your wallet out, I highly recommend a trip up to Bushwick. You can grab your lunch at Eddie's, your dessert at the Dolceria a block east on Knickerbocker (try the gelato), and eat the whole lot across the street from Eddie on a bench in the grand plaza of Maria Hernandez Park (formerly Bushwick Park, as it is still labelled on gmaps, renamed for a community leader murdered for her aggressive anti-gang and anti-drug activism). With MTA fare, that's a $20 date for two! Who says the recession can't be more like recess?
You can find ENCLAVE here and OUTPOST here on Goodreads to add to your TBR shelf! And be on the look-out for another UH-MAZE-ING Razorland series book trailer! This ENCLAVE trailer still blows my mind:
- I will choose two winners at the end of the competition, each of whom will receive a shiny new copy of Plum Blossoms In Paris.
Kaleb, for the first four days of our stay in Sanibel wouldn't go near the water, the waves were just too big, and even when in my arms he didn't want me to go in the water. I kept telling him to trust me, that it would be fun, but he adamantly refused. Then, one day the waves were calmer, and the water was warm. Kaleb allowed me to take him in, and what he discovered was that he loved the water! He sat in the water and with a huge smile announced that he was swimming. If only he had trusted me in the previous days, his fun would have been extended. I wonder how much I too am missing because I am too afraid to let go, and believe Him when he tells me to trust him enough to follow where I am afraid to go?
Jatt: I’m sure we will too.
WR: Jarius Wright, Arkansas
And you could not hear a sound from the Avenue.
One thing that you will need for this class is a glue gun. If you don't have one, you can borrow or buy yourself a gift and purchase Imaginisce's i-bond Cordless Glue Gun - I did at the store! LOL!!
About 1½ hours before you are planning to bake, remove the dough from the refrigerator. Place the dough on a lightly floured surface, dust each dough with flour, cover loosely but completely with plastic (to prevent having the top go crusty). Let the dough rest for 1 hour until reach room temperature, and feel spongy when touch.
The other day I got a CD from Best Buy and while in the parking lot decided to open the CD to listen to it in the car. I got the wrapper off and then went to pop the hinge on the bottom, and the hinge broke. ARGH. Then I went to separate the two halves of the case and the sticker broke off from the top section. It only came cleanly off the back part of the case. The front part of the sticker came off in about 3 pieces.
SH: The answer to hand washing is that you don't buy anything that needs to be hand washed.
(4) The defense filed a motion to summon Brian Meehan as its own witness, blocking Nifong’s effort to pursue the case the “good old-fashioned way” by pretending as if DNA evidence didn’t exist.
Kim C: when is Shatner cooler than Kirk ?
Before he could say anything, a voice piped up from the other side of the table. “They don’t have the right to do that, do they?” Another voice and then another joined in. “If they can do that to our tutors, who’s to say they won’t decide to do it to us?” Linden tried to tell them that students were immune from that kind of treatment, but he wasn’t sure he believed it, himself. The babble over-rode anything he said, and he realized it was all going out of control. Not even Bennett would be able to put a stop to it.
Whisk together flour, baking powder, and salt.
One such performer that has made the most of their from a professional and performer sense is Luke Henery from the Mansfield, Brisbane act, Violent Soho. Violent Soho first formed in 2004 and released their debut EP “Pigs and TV” in 2006. After touring with nationally with groups such as The Grates and Faker, the band was able to fund their debut release, “We Don’t Belong Here”. In 2009, Violent Soho announced they were signed to Ecstatic Peace! Records, a label headed by Sonic Youth’s Thurston Moore, consequently allowing them to tour overseas while recording their debut international release; their self-titled, Violent Soho. Since Henery’s return to Australia in late 2010, he has been married, commenced work as a carpenter whilst being on the books for working at live music venue, The Zoo and independent guitar store, Tym’s Guitars. I was able to contact Luke Henery to discuss the idea of championing a scene and creating connections to your advantage.
"DO NOT PUT OUT THE SPIRIT'S FIRE;
It's like they know what they are putting you through and they are filled with delight at the idea. It is positively rude.
We've seen the balance sheet. Now it's time to listen to what the accountants, Mr. Tait and Mr. Murray, had to say.
Did I forget to mention? I GOT THE WOOLLY MAMMOTH!
38. Gucci Mane - Writings On The Wall II
Now as the book is about to drop, they're already heading up there. For the first time in recent history, the Northwest Passage is becoming passable. And that changes… a great deal. Geopolitics. Resources. Even entire nations.
If you want your daughter in an organization that is primed to keep her barefoot and pregnant, teach her to be subservient and that sex is bad, then Girl Scouts is NOT the organization for you. Girl Scouts is all about teaching girls to be independent, caring, active members of society who think for themselves and are proud of who they are. Girl Scouts promotes girls and women's rights. If that's not what you want for your daughter, then find another group for her to join. But don't be surprised when Girl Scouts tries to keep up with the times.
Audi Sport Team Joest also contests the World Championship round at Spa-Francorchamps (Belgium) on May 5 in the same formation. At the same time the race doubles as a dress rehearsal for the 24 Hours of Le Mans. Only Mike Rockenfeller will miss this race due to a clashing date with the DTM.
This time Tess spotted it and went towards it, standing until they were almost nose to nose. Scared that the fox might attack her, the farmer clapped his hands and the fox turned tail and went off down the pasture, hotly pursued by Tess - obviously a fox hound in Border Terrier skin.
I have REALLY been beating myself up lately over some habits I’ve formed that I’m not SUPER proud of. Meaning, we eat out too much, I’m eating too much processed food, and not cooking or preparing for me week the way I’d like.
During our discussion, I tried the change between the two phrases myself. My intention was not to demonstrate how to play, but to see how we approached the switch differently.
leaning stone known as “Satan’s Lamppost” and local residents never venture near the granite oddity when this spectral illumination is sighted. Many discount the lights as the product of swamp gas, moonlight on low clouds, and even large congregations of fireflies, but those disbelievers suggest these explanations a comfortable distance away from the ancient stone.
I Kuthumi and Lord Hilarion come to share with you knowledge, peace and love. We here are all aware of the stirrings of the great energy Gaia ( Earth) as she seeks to cleanse old energies, and prepare for the new. This is similar to what mankind must also undertake. Some have begun, some are merely thinking about the whole idea, others have completed, let go and are ready and waiting to step into the new energy fields almost upon you. Lord Hilarion will continue.
My friend Jon Binkley had suggested I stop at Zeitgeist, a biker/bike messenger bar on Valencia. Well, what the hell, I'm an affable guy, we went. It was a good time. Yeah, it's scruffy, but no one was rude, no one was pushy, none of the stuff the reviews at Yelp squealed about happened. Er...it was a Monday afternoon, of course. It was real nice out back in the outside area: old wood tables and benches, wild mural art, and a barbecue smoker going. We had a couple IPAs (Big Daddy and Racer 5), relaxed, and then headed up over the hill towards Suppenküche, the German place where we were supposed to meet Jon.
So all in all, the rash lasted 10 weeks, 1 week before I gave birth, maybe even 2 if I can recall, but I wasn't too attuned to it because it was low on the list of things that was going on and it hadn't peaked in severity yet. It was at its worst 1-2 weeks after delivery and finally completely went away 6 weeks Postpartum.
Overall, a very superb lip gloss formula that I'd absolutely, without hesitation, recommend!
Always challenge yourself to do better, and be better. Always learn from the past and present, to better understand where you are going.
"Ohhh," Liberty nodded knowingly. "How little were you when you were Mehwisha Jane?"
With rules setting a high front wing ride height and small diffusers, aero performance is limited. So teams have worked out how to work around these rules by angling the entire car into a nose down attitude. This is known as ‘Rake’, teams will run several degrees of rake to get the front wing lower and increase the effective height of the diffuser exit. Thus the front wing will sit closer to the track, than the 75mm when the car is parallel to the ground. While at the rear, the 12.5cm tall diffuser sits an additional 10cm clear of the track, making its expansion ratio greater. Teams were using the EBD, to seal this larger gap between the diffuser and the floor. Without the EBD teams will have to find alternative way to drive airflow into the gap to create a virtual skirt between the diffuser and track.
Sweet Lucy by Shorty Ashford
I was pondering the “Who are your people?” question as I was getting ready for big business trip to Germany. As the trip got closer, I got the familiar feelings of unrest that I get when I travel. Will everything be okay at home? Will I be able to find my way when I am in a completely different place? Will I be successful with the work I need to do? And the huge fear that looms in the back of my head - what if I don’t come back ?
I would welcome any comments or feedback.
As a lil girl I don’t remember liking Dr. Seuss, I was more of a Disney story book girl, I can remember asking my mom night after night to read me snow white and the seven dwarfs, even asking her to say Teddi instead of Dopey. I don’t know why, Dopey never said anything. Sleeping Beauty, Cinderella, The Emperors New Clothes, Rumpelstiltskin, Rapunzel, The Fox and The Hound, Bambie…..I could go on and on about the books I loved as a kid. But as a parent I love Dr. Seuss, that guy can rhyme anything and has the most bizarre imagination…
Proof is in the itinerary that the possibility of overdosing from this boozy vacay was a bona fide concern.
I can’t specifically tell you when I came to my path, but I can point at most of the things that led to it. My father was something of a cross between agnostic and atheist, but certain…attitudes were ingrained in me: a love and respect for nature, a habit for recycling, not bowing before someone just because they think they are your spiritual superior. In grade and middle school, I went to a small Episcopal church, and the father there encouraged my questions and didn’t think my age should have any influence on my desire to learn and to serve. In high school, I had a “Born Again” experience. The church I went to initially focused upon having the most dynamic and personal spirituality possible. At the time, I was also on the speech and debate team…so certain “habits” and “skills” were learned. At one point, I toured over the summer with the Continental Singers, a Christian ministry group. Their training program had me memorizing over a thousand bible verses…the verse, the context it was taken from in the passage, and the general “counseling” category it fit into. Their training also taught me about other faiths, and how to witness my faith with honesty, respect, and questions, much like if you were simply having a conversation with a friend. When my home church shifted its focus towards “simply” converting the masses/winning over numbers, I left because of the hypocrisy but maintained my faith. Over the next couple of years after graduating, I continued to pursue and question my beliefs and path. If I found something that worked, it was incorporated. If something no longer worked, it was discarded. One day a friend brought me into a pagan book store in New York and I came to the realization that I was pagan. I was rather surprised and had (and have) no clue when specifically it happened. That realization was in late ’89. My love of theology has only increased since then.
But of course this is like watching a goose floating on the serenity of a pond. You'd never see it's poor little feet pedaling in hyper speed underneath the calm surface. You see and imagine dance moves from the serene glide where not even a feather is twitched.
Assumed being the key word. All evidence to date points to the GOP as trying to swallow up the liberty movement so the party can destroy it. I hope and pray that I am wrong. If liberty-loving Ohioans are very watchful of their state and federal representatives, and put intense pressure upon them to reduce the size and cost of government, well and good. But if we don't, we will find ourselves two years from now being as unhappy with the Republicans as we were two years ago, and as we just were this year with the Democrats.
We said goodbye to Josie last night. Our options had narrowed, and we have always stood by one mantra when it comes to our animals: No suffering.
if there is no emotional outburst, then the starting point is naive & not psychological, nevertheless, still the correctness of that judgment is even more complex
If it was hard to imagine life without him before he died, in the days since he left it's been near impossible. I see him in virtually every corner of our house. His bed in my study and his other bed in our family room. His water dish. His toys. His nose prints on the back door.
This server is the exact opposite of the one we reviewed for you yesterday. No griefing is allowed or tolerated, it is not a PvP server, it is strictly to build and have fun. I honestly prefer these servers a bit more than the PvP ones. Though, there are pros and cons to each. Anyway, it is a really fun server that Tyler originally introduced me to. You might want to check it out, that is, when it starts working better.
These days, you can grow yourself. You can put out books quicker than the Big 6, earn more money, reach more readers, and have more control over the entire process.
Oh, yeah! Two characters that we love are finally moving forward in their relationship. Yes, there were two momentous kisses in this episode. (Not that I counted or anything…cough…) Let’s get to it!
Let me make one thing quite clear. I have sufficient intellect to understand that colour of a person’s skin has nothing to do with being a Savage. The modern Oxford dictionary describes a Savage as ‘fierce’ - ‘cruel’ – ‘wild’ – ‘primitive’ – ‘a member of a primitive tribe’ – ‘a cruel or barbarous person’. If I happen to refer to a specific person in this article as being “savage” ---- don’t label me as a racist simply because that person happens to have a black skin!
Odd thing is that the people who DO NOT have children gave my daughter gift receipts. (reminder to self - thank these people and buy them nicer gifts next year!) The people WITH children did not give gift receipts. Huh? Don't we all know that once we have kids it is an unwritten rule that you always GIVE the gift receipts? OK unless you re-gift. Which, by the way, I am 100% OK with.
It's Debbie here today, just helping out for Alberto.
Sponged Mutton Chunks.
I kept thinking about what God had spoken to me on the deck. Later in the morning, I was praying about it again. This time God added something more to what He had whispered.
Or maybe not. Last night I saw some kind of dating program on TV, where the guy said he felt “cheated” because the girl’s father Googled him and discovered he was in a video called Hotel Erotica, which anyone could watch right there on the Internet. When the daughter eliminated him from the dating pool, he felt cheated. What was really painful to watch was how inarticulate and apologetic this girl was about the whole thing (“maybe it’s just me…”), while he was browbeating her about what a great guy he was, and blaming her for never having asked him if he’d done such a movie—because if she had asked, he would have told her the truth! Nobody else had ever had a problem with it! He was an actor, he said, just playing a role so that it looked like they were doing something in the movie when they really weren’t. None of his parts were shown, and he’d had a lot of lines. He felt cheated at being kicked off the show because he thought this girl was a great catch.
People have been using powder on their skin since the ancient Egyptians wore lead and chalk to lighten their complexion, These days we don't have to go to quite that extreme.
